Tucson or Phoenix area?
That sounds fair.
Dick Cheney and His Energy Policy Review Board.
The last time Nintendo came out with a 3-D console, it was [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Virtual_Boy). So I'm going to wait. Besides, I am happy with my DS Lite.
I'm like this in far less complicated setup.   I have 2 PC's at home and frequently have a friend over for co-op or online stuff. Main PC gets all the games that I will only buy 1 copy of, single player stuff. second PC gets all the online, multiplayer, co-op stuff; and the username and pwd are shared in a small circle of friends. That way I can co-op anyone using the account and never have to share my main set of games. 
*Hundreds* of well controlled studies? Really? If your standards are that high, you'll never discover anything interesting.
How did your ride consume the LSD? Did you just stick blotters to the frame or did the seat somehow ingest a sugar cube?
No need for the frowny face, you did an excellent job of providing a superficial impression!   :)
Do you have difficulty learning, or do you just refuse to?
I guess the plus here is that my girlfriend is Canadian. But then there's the immigration thing.
For those few who can't speak German it says "to fart around". It was actually my high point of those movies.
Thanks for your input :]
Not to mention that RF/Antenna design is a hot field right now, and a lot  companies need them all the time. If you have a Masters with an RF specialty, you would be making crazy bank right now. 
caipirinha.  but i doubt they know it/have the right liquor.  i don't think i've ever seen cachaca stocked at a non-Brazilian bar.
 I love it! It's so zen I doubt a scene like the one in Psycho would occur near it. :p
YES! Gilligan's Island! what other boat jokes are there?
Offer to pay, but follow the double insist rule: if she says no twice, untie her and just let her head back to day care.
How do you unignore someone?
I see where you are coming from! If all else fails Im gonna have to go with an organ (im thinking reggae style church organ?) but the original is by a local Ska band who never made it big and broke up to become an emo band. So its more of a testiment or recreation then a cover. cheers for all the help tho. from everyone. I was running out of ideas. Only found this subreddit today. its awesome.
Based only on what I've seen in the video, I support this man 100%.  Of course, I will need to do a lot more research to be sure, since anyone can put out one good video every once in a while.
The guitarist handbook - Ralph Denyer http://www.amazon.com/Guitar-Handbook-Ralph-Denyer/dp/0679742751 I started out with this book a few years back, and because of its lack of pictures and illustrations, I thought it wasn't all that complete. After buying several other books, I found myself using this one more and more because of how thorough and complete job it does covering all topics. If something is not mentioned in this book, it lets you know where to find it. 
It could also be a primal instinct that causes some women to ingest their placenta.  Animals in the wild will eat the placenta after giving birth.
From the OED :   German Pumpernickel, Pompernickel, Bompernickel black bread, especially of the type characteristic of Westphalia (mid 17th cent.; earlier apparently in sense ‘lout’ (1628 as pumpernikel: see note); compare later regional (southern) use in sense ‘vivacious child’, ‘a small plump person or child’), probably &lt; early modern German pumper fart (1558 in this sense; German regional (Austria) Pumper) or its etymon pumpern to knock, fall noisily (Middle High German pumpern, of ultimately imitative origin (compare BUMP v.1, BUMP n.1); compare -ern -ER suffix5) + Nickel, pet-form of the male fore-name Nikolaus Nicholas. Compare French pumpernickel (1765; also as bonpournickel).   Although the meaning of the earliest attestation of the word in German is not entirely certain, it is clearly depreciative. As applied to bread it was apparently also originally depreciative and was perhaps originally applied to Westphalian bread by outsiders. This type of bread was probably so called either on account of its being difficult to digest and causing flatulence or in a more general allusion to its hardness and poor quality.   For evidence that the name was unknown in Westphalia in the early 17th cent., compare: 1617 F. MORYSON Itinerary III. 50 That West-Phalians deuoure..browne bread (vulgarly cranck broat, that is, sicke bread).(With cranck in cranck broat compare CRANK adj.3).   From the 17th cent. onwards a popular etymology is found that the name derives from French bon pour Nicol ‘good (only) for Nicol’, Nicol being taken as the name of a horse, and the form bon pour Nicol is actually found in early modern German in allusion to this. This is reflected in the form bonpournikel (compare also French bonpournickel
Good thing you're spending the day on Internet instead of with her.
If this is true, it's just about the most offensive thing a company can do to it's customers.
It's not cheating if you don't get caught
I didn't mean that at all. I meant horrible as in, "not playing in an entertaining manner". I would be annoyed if England made it to the final, just because they wouldn't have deserved it based on their group matches.
Click the YouTube logo inside the video to open its YouTube page, and then you can watch it in HD.
What does hdr stand for? I don't know much about photography, but I think that's what's hurting my eyes too. Otherwise it's a decent shot.
Its like the Leah Betts case in the UK. Mindless scaremongering. If 185,000 people get drunk nobody mentions the stomach pumps and vomiting. As soon as drugs are involved everyone wants raves banned. All this will do is drive them underground where there is less supervision and much greater chances of danger. More raves - Less uneducated drug users. [Lycaeum](http://www.lycaeum.org) and [Erowid](http://www.erowid.org) can help you. Learn what is going into your bodies and treat it with respect. :)
Series 2 is currently broadcasting here, so that list was up to date. Good they're on YouTube.
God aborts more babies than any doctor ever did. He clearly is rather fond of the practice. Too bad he does so randomly including to mothers who actually want babies. At least abortion doctors only prevent children from entering the world when the parents or mother doesn't want them.
...if you survive the neck/ice pick scenario, obviously.
Well, I think asset size goes a long way. For example a 1 megapixel jpeg image is going to be like 500kb in good quality. Back then though a high quality image was 120x80 pixels in monochrome color, which uncompressed no header is about 1.2kb, which means you could store about 1000 pics of low res low color naked ladies on one of those discs. 
No, I never have, that I know of. I don't know what a telnet based game is.
Installed an invisible app on some of my girl mates laptops (without their knowledge) that sits silently until halloween, then activates at a random time whilst they are using their laptop. Suddenly a bloody skull-face appears full screen and a wretched scream blasts out of the speakers. BOOM.  Lisa almost had a heart attack that day. Once she had gotten over it though, she distracted Soph whilst i installed it on her laptop too!
Have you got any good stories, whether they be funny, awesome, sad, inspiring, shocking or surprising?
Once he put out my burning building, rebuilt the damage, stuck some cats in there, and set the whole damn thing ablaze again!  I don't know what happened next. Good thing about your cats, btw.
Yep. Also good for the times I fall asleep before the bf and I get woken up to see his ;) face, which means it's time for immediate business!
Thanks for confirming your troll status.
&gt; your such a looser.  FTFY
Upvote for name/link coordination.
I remember when we did a specific proof in planar graphs class that spanned two and a half 90 minute lectures, with some parts as homework. When everything finally fell into place... yeah.
No! No go back to the bedroom and your Wii!  :)  JK.  Actually, I'm not really.  My wife doesn't see the point of my (and my son's too) 360.  But she loves the Wii.  She plays that more than my "wii".
Which one is [you](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YLAcDQLOiDg)?
Well I don't live in the US, so nothing in general!  I'm running a half-marathon that morning though.
It's not a "claim". Almost every economist whose view I've read on this situation, be they rigid Austrians or Keynesians, has agreed that stimulus spending was needed. Low interest rates certainly did feed the bubble throughout the 2000's, but that was the fault of the Greenspan/Friedman acolytes who ignored all of the lessons that were learned during and after the Great Depression.   There IS a clear and grave danger of long-term deflation. The situation we're in today is strikingly similar to what Japan went through. They have been caught in a cycle of deflation and low growth for the last 20+ years. Every time their economy perked up a bit, it was killed with premature spending cuts and tax increases.   People go on about the "war on the dollar" and how the currency is going to be destroyed, but as I said before, T-bills are at their lowest yields in a very long time, and the dollar is stronger than it has been in years. Undoubtedly, in about 20 years if we're still pushing stimulus spending, then we'll be in a gigantic world of hurt, but for the next 5 years or so? We're absolutely fine, particularly as long as Europe and the EU remains in the funk. The only thing that could cause the deficit to do us big-time harm in the short and medium term is if another reserve currency magically appears. The Euro threatened to do that for awhile, but it's pretty obvious that won't be happening, and China shows no signs whatsoever of wanting the Yuan to become the world's de-facto reserve currency anytime soon.   Honestly, the Social Security problem is pretty simple: the age at which people can qualify just has to be bumped up by 5 years or so. That won't fully fill the hole, but will go a very long way to doing so. No desperate austerity measures are needed.  I don't think you understand what an austerity program at this point will do to the economy. Or, if you do, you don't give a shit. Talk about the American economy "surviving"? If massive spending cuts were enacted, what we would see would be beyond anything those advocating such measures possibly imagine. For an idea, look at the Baltic states, particularly Latvia. GDP dropped by almost 25% since initiation of an austerity program. *THAT* is economic destruction.  I don't think there's anyone who knows anything about economics who's saying "deficits should continue to be built up forever!" The budget deficit has to be cut. But the time to do so. Is. *not*. now. 
These people have survived without guardians for how long?
aww thank you for making my day!
22 / white / male / atheist / experimental electronic musician and audio engineer in Northern Virginia  edit: very much broke haha this general area is so goddamned expensive
I was going to rush in here and say "It doesn't have a serial port".  But - Holy Crap - it has an RS232!  Jesus H Chribt on a pony!
That's pretty awesome. One of the comments cracked me up (got to love the daily mail).  &gt; What a waste of money, time and resources. Leave it buried. What possible things can be learnt from a set of stone rings 4000 years old that bear relation to modern life? This country has far more pressing needs for money and resources than unearthing ancient stones.
X-men(persons) rip-off fail!
This is whole reason that when people tell me "Ads don't work on me, I'm immune to them" I respond "No, you're not."  Ads circulate the brand into public consciousness... of course. When I think of dish soap, I think of "Dawn" or "Sunlight". I'm sure there are dozens of other brands, but those ones jump into my mind, because I've been exposed to the name more often.   They also sell the idea that you'll be sexier, manlier, stronger, healthier, or cleaner if you use this particular product. That's not something we're terribly cognizant of while we shop, but it lurks underneath.  ...that's also why I feel sexier when I use Dawn... I think. 
Bill Bryson, Bill Bryson, Bill Bryson. Particularly A Walk in the Woods.
My new background!
I've had this issue before (and maybe still do). When my boyfriend and I first started dating, one of my close friends often made fun of him and stuff but would never outright admit she didn't like him. Later on she wrote an entry in my journal (something for school, it was lame) basically going on about what a loser he was and how stupid I was for dating him. I pretty much stopped being friends with her then. Another friend reacted similarly and some of my family doesn't like him because they think he's too meek or shy maybe? But he's introverted - that doesn't make him a bad person! I guess everyone in my life has the feeling that I need to end up with someone who takes charge and is super "manly," but god forbid I actually know what I like best. Point is, these people clearly dislike him for stupid reasons such as personality traits he can't control (introverted, harsh/sarcastic humor, etc.), but I love those things about him! If he was beating me up every night, then I could understand the sour reactions, but he doesn't. Still, it does suck to know that your family/friends dislike your boyfriend and are rooting for you to break up. What a support system, right? I just never go to them if I have any relationship issues.
On thier own accord?  About 1 Every other year.
71 points as a Engiee in "Warpath". Not to many Sentry-kills, but think I has about 100 teleporters. My team trying to get the 4th point, and yes, then die to much.  52 (or 54, I dont remember) as a Demoman. Spaming in front door of 2Fort lol....a lot of lemmings (pyros) comming in our base to destroy lev1 sentrys. I just set sticks traps to help engies.
here are few more:  in his cap and cape: http://hawaiifreestorage.com/bitcache/9a3623bacfc19521034e1ce7cf43f18f40481066?vid=63&amp;disposition=inline&amp;op=view  huh?: http://hawaiifreestorage.com/bitcache/9d7b51731f0ce37f745feb83c3f37ea53f45f09c?vid=64&amp;disposition=inline&amp;op=view
I put the towel on the floor under my clothes.
you could become a star in the adult film industry
Drugs affect your ability to judge yourself and your environment. Therefore, subjective arguments by people on drugs can be considered worthless. Like it or not... However, this is not restricted to illegal drugs. And can also include things like pheremones, hormones, basic stupidity, alcohol, cigarettes, and so on. 
What if weekday was meant?  You don't know.  All you know is the question didn't ask for anything dealing with day.  Thus it has nothing to do with the answer.
I love math too. I haven't taken many math classes and I'm still in school so I'll just link this: [Gabriel's Horn](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gabriel%27s_Horn)  It's a 3 dimensional shape that has infinite surface area but finite volume. It's a fairly simple concept, but it's still super cool when you think about it.
This thread makes me sad.
That was great, but no Kevin Spacey in Swimming With Sharks? [Shame](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b2SLAgrouiw#t=0m22s).
Mel Gibson is the man but shouldnt have apologized 
Good point.  I'm not sure whether it was this inaccuracy or just rape itself that has lead to my downvotes, but either way, I think reddit has shown good taste in downvoting that.
ya it's much easier when there's a language barrier/buffer.  Interaction is leveled to simpler variables.  I did the Eurail thing for a few months after college, started in Spain, with no Spanish.   By the time I was in English-speaking lands, it was easy to make new travel-friends. Don't know what you're planning, but I took off with a train pass, a few guide books, a horrible backpack, and a vague notion of 'hosteling.'   You may start with butterflies, but once you've solved the practical considerations, any fear quickly desolves into an appreciation for adventure &amp; new experiences.  Sounds like just what you need.  
Fuck, I put "Toast Peoples Guns." What did you get for question 6?
Also, happy soon-to-be birthday!
&gt; Which of those you listed do you think cannot?  Specifically the feeling in my gut that something good or bad is going going to happen without any direct evidence to support such a claim. I have no idea why I would have a chemical reaction that would randomly make me think I should go check on my kids or that it is going to be a particularly pleasant day.   None of that really matters though, the point is that in my head, I feel as though my mind is an incorporeal entity, I always have.  &gt; This doesn't make any sense to me. If crossing over is a way to maintain who you are while leaving your body behind, why would almost crossing over change you?   I don't assume that I will retain anything about my former self if there is an afterlife. I don't rule out some form of reincarnation or something similar where my next form is different.   &gt;And I'm not talking about near death experiences or out of body experiences that some people view as spiritual awakenings and lead them to a more spiritual life. I'm talking about things like this, where a brain injury alters someones personality so that someone who met them after not having seen them in a long time wouldn't be sure they're the same person anymore. I, personally, am not even sure at that point that they are the same person.  Yes, I understand, you mean they are injured so uniquely that they are a totally different person, again I think oddities of that nature show us just how little we really understand about what the mind is. 
I've held on to phrases/concepts like that for more than ten years at a time in waiting.  It will not be in vain.
&gt;Edit: I must say, I'm amazed when this sort of stuff gets upvoted. I'm a fucking troll.  The emperor has no clothes. I imagine some variant of Poe's Law can adequately explain your upvotes.
You should just be able to feel their ribs under the skin.  If you can't feel their ribs then they're too fat.  If you can get your finger between the ribs they're too skinny.  I have a Siberian Husky and a Staffordshire Bull Terrier who are both around 20kg. (The staffy is big for his breed) They're both a really healthy weight and we were even told the other week by the vet that we have the healthiest husky they've seen :] Usually they get really overweight ones. I give my dogs two cups of dry biscuits a day. 
downvoted because of the HORRIBLY annoying music.
So I went to bed one night after watching a ghost show on the history channel. 30 seconds after I turn off the lights and the room is pitch black things start to fall down all over the room. At first I try and think of an explanation, but then a heavy object on a shelf above my bed hit me on the head and that is when I really got scared. I was absolutely totally paralyzed with fear, I had my arms at my side laying on my back perfectly stiff.  I sat there for what must have been a half hour contemplating my situation. I was sweating profusely, shivering and ready to cry. All the while objects fall to the floor, glass shatters around me, my books topple over like dominoes. I was going back to my childhood trying to remember prayers from church, I threw away all my atheistic beliefs because I was completely certain a ghost was in my room taunting me.  Prayer having no affect, I decided on one possible solution. I set turning on the light as my next immediate goal, I would have to get up and dash across the room to turn it on. I waited for a pause in the commotion got up and fully expected to be confronted by a ghost or demon and killed immediately. I hit the light switch and leapt back onto my bed and under my covers. Aside from a totally wrecked room I could see nothing, then I heard a little pat on the carpet. I looked down and to my relief saw a flying squirrel on the floor.  I learned a lot about myself that night.
i am still laughing, good title
You aren't really allowed to tip in places like that. I worked in a coffee shop in a grocery store, so I guess you can call that a fast food coffee shop of sorts. That place was a bitch with "loss prevention"and we weren't allowed to take tips or have a tip jar like most coffee shops. Now that doesn't stop people from tipping, but if you get caught accepting a tip, you got in big trouble/fired. The same went for the cashier/bag boy/person who takes your cart out for you.  So, it's a nice gesture, but you could be jeopardizing that person's job. 
Dammit. Beat me to it. All you need.  [Here is the channel](http://www.youtube.com/user/mrchicity3?blend=1&amp;ob=4#p/u/1/IBRL7D0wcXM)
Did I miss something, is the iphone now dangerous or something?
Lucky guess. Did they let you keep the cool orange vest???
I couldn't watch this video fully till I turned on the vuvuzela button.  Thanks youtube!
Because...... Life's a bitch and then you die, make sense?
Yes.  It says:  &gt;"The National Constitution Centre is awarding him its Liberty Medal for "steadfast" efforts to broker peace in Northern Ireland and the Middle East."  He *actively negated* peace in the Middle East. This award is a crock.
"And what's he then that says I play the villain?"
True
good luck with that.
Thanks for the update!  This is essentially what I was getting at. From a _nutritional_ standpoint, eating a placenta makes no goddamn sense. But I highly doubt any endocrinologists or immunologists have done a serious study of placentophagy and I was kind of hoping you would prove me wrong.  Scientists, particularly medical scientists, are notoriously bad at working across disciplinary lines. If there is any benefit or harm from this practice, it's probably not going to be found where we're looking. Hence, epidemiological studies would be valuable for determining the significance of the practice, if it has any.  If I had my journal subscriptions I'd just be reading up instead of talking to you on reddit about it. But thanks for putting yourself out there for the questions.
in that case the bikers were clearly not paying attention... if you slam into a car that is already stopped.. you are NOT watching the road ahead of you.  Only a bank of fog would have been an excuse for hitting a parked car.
Ugh that hurt my head trying to figure out if that was funny or not
This corporation is now the ultimate power in the universe. I suggest we use it.
arizona iced tea
Bingo! Ooh... How fun!
He's going to announce that someone has written TeX in TeX
Every protoscientist today is considered a "crackpot". Anyone who doesn't agree with the "normal" way of thinking is automatically labelled a crackpot. In that sense (at least to me), the word crackpot seems more of a compliment about open mindedness.
I go with the [pronunciation](http://www.publicradio.org/tools/media_player/popup.php?name=phc/2010/06/26/phc_20100626_64&amp;starttime=00:59:35.0&amp;endtime=00:59:46.0) from *A Prairie Home Companion* myself.  Guy Noir - Private Eye
Tomorrow IS a Thursday, but I'm not so sure... we'll just have to wait and find out I guess.
Recorded it at a studio here in Edmonton, mastered at Tuff Gong studios in Jamaica. Thanks!!  We love Paul Simon and James Taylor! 
They can't put all the real women up. Just the ones they want.
HELLS YUS!!!!
HELLS YUS!!!!
Well, that's pretty damn cool, then.  I had heard rumors that a google engineer said that enabling FM radio and 802.11(n) would have to be "left to the hacker community" or something like that.
Maybe it will finally look better then the Jaguar version.  Not hold my breath.
IT'S OVER NI-- oh fuck this shit.
Tons of people.
Anyone else suddenly have the urge to video tape every single interaction with women, solely for evidence?  I'm honestly getting to the point where I'm afraid to invite a woman over, for fear that she'll turn out to be a loon and accuse me of rape, even if nothing at all transpired.
99% of the things we take into our bodies are unhealthy.  HFCS, Wheat Gluten, Pollution in the air and water are just a few of them  From the link in your post OP.  "Though controversial (many clinicians continue to conclude that the relatively mild withdrawal syndrome associated with cannabis indicates that dependence is unlikely and treatment unnecessary), research has shown that some cannabis users may develop cannabis-related problems, including dependency."  But basically, people can become addicted to doughnuts or running or all sorts of various things if they have addictive personalities.  I have also heard a lot of studies saying that it can cause cancer, but almost an identical amount claiming that it can help in the treatment of cancer (not for appetite, that it actually can help break down the tumors)  I wont even justify the slacker stereotype, I know guys who are making 500k Plus a year who get high every day.  Police officers, lawyers, computer programmers.  All walks of life.  That said, the deuche bags out there spraypainting the sides of buildings yelling 420 4 lyfe! definitely can give the wrong impression.  So yes, idiots get high and do idiotic things.  I think the benefits of having a non-prescription stress and sleep aid is huge.  I also dont really see the point in keeping it illegal. And yes...a big part of the "its harmless" comes from OMG REEEFER MADNESSSSS!!!!  IF YOU SMOKE POT YOU WILL MURDER YOUR FAMILY TO GET MONEY TO BUY MORE POT!.... oh... hey... wait... all it did was give me the munchies and make me enjoy spongebob squarepants more.  But to be perfectly honest I think we all need to spend less time self medicating ourselves and more time getting our shit together for the class war that we are all embroiled in.  Willfully or not, we exist in the time that defines the future of our children, and anything we do that makes us pay LESS attention to the world around us and keeps us from doing our duty as citizens* is a negative.  That goes for social networks, TV, Alcohol and other drugs... and yes... even websites like reddit.  :(  *Our duty as citizens is to hold our government accountable for enforcing the will of its PEOPLE.
Actually, a sandwich WOULD be good right now! I'm making hummus wraps. Want one?
karma for things you've submitted
This is too sweet and cute as well.&lt;3
That is reality my friend. People fuck up and bad things happen. However people are just as capable of making good decisions as they are bad ones and you have to give them the chance to do so. That's what life is.
It's ugly, but thankfully its also pretty rare.
he means that its pretty reasonable that someone would be actually selling their dog, and receive a joke response
Well, I'd like to hear input. I will suggest 8 pm EST three nights a week first off, but since I haven't heard any input back I have no idea if that will work for most of the people interested.
I want that dog!
No, no--drinking nor smoking caused his cancer; he must have provoked the wrath of god.  $20 to the person who first finds some idiot with this belief. 
Definitely a good reason. I think it will attract a lot of people who looked at games like WoW or Eve Online and just thought how outdated it looked compared to non-MMOs. Also what you said really makes me wonder what will happen to WoW in say 3 or 4 years when it really looks outdated. Will the continue with expansions and very minor graphical updates or try a WoW2?
Actually, many of them are doing community service after they get busted. It's just like the right-wing meme that numbers of people entering rehab for pot is skyrocketing. Ignoring the fact that it's the COURTS offering this diversion instead of jail time.  
that's hilarious because i am READING THAT BOOK RIGHT THIS SECOND!
Hmmmmm... let me check the list of things I remotely give a shit about... Nope, no John Mayer. Next?
The vuvuzuela button makes this more entertaining, and more touching somehow...
And nothing of value was lost.
I guess it's to sort of drain the body of energy. If your body is cold and weak, you're a lot less likely to continue getting upset and angry.
"Sometimes electricity mysteriously kills people for being sinners...and no one knows when it will happen. So keep praying...and obeying!"
wowstead got hacked awhile back, if you used the same email and password.
http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/ckqis/greatest_newspaper_headline_ever/
RED ROVER, RED ROVER, WE CALL CRASSY OVER
It is like comment karma, it increases with every link you submit to reddit. Self/text posts do not count toward this karma.
just cause it rots you insides doesn't mean you'll get fat.  You will be rotten though.
I think his brain's come undone...
[He was too](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=umRRCkspaQU)   
&gt;I don't have to spell it out for you. Just go back through your replies. It's not my job to think for you (although I can't imagine that it would be very hard).  Actually, it is your job to explain what you mean.  I can't figure out what **you** mean by reading **my** comments.  The whole point of this conversation, from my point of view, is an honest exchange of ideas.  I'm actually trying to understand where you're coming from.  Perhaps you're not approaching it with the same goal in mind.  It seems more like you want to "win" .  Perhaps you'd care to illuminate me and actually say what you're referring to.  What specific equivocation did I make that you find objectionable?  &gt;Well, then. No.  Just to be absolutely clear, you're saying that members of a society see absolutely no benefit from being a part of it?  &gt;That wasn't the question. Everybody knows you can't do business with yourself, unless this "second person" you speak of is some uninspired metaphor.  I don't quite follow you here.  I never said someone could do business with themselves.  I was inquiring about the nature of your comment "It would be the same either way", which was a response to this question: "Would they be able to have the same quality of business relationship -- or even have the luxury of having business at all -- without a society built up around them in which to do business?"  You seem to be saying here that, whether someone is part of a society or simply a loner in a log cabin in the woods, they'd be able to do business exactly the same.  As this seems an odd position -- from my point of view, anyway -- I was hoping for some clarity.  Once again, I'm genuinely trying to understand your point of view on this.  I hope, perhaps naively, that you're approaching it the same way.  It doesn't really seem like it so far.
I agree (no yankee fan)
Maybe the trick for this is to only play the console ones. The only handheld zelda I played was Link's Awakening and it was fuckin sweet. As far as I'm concerned, every console Zelda after aLttP is awesome.
And lo, another meme was born.
Protip:  Don't hang out with Americans.  Make a group of friends from where you're studying at and you'll have ten times as much fun.
They lost me a lot earlier on when they did a show about recycling. They did some really pissweak "candid camera" style pranks on people involvin recycling bins and then tried to suggest this showed we were too hung up on recycling. And their episode on drugs contained one of the dumbest things I've ever heard someone say while trying to sound clever: "The Grateful dead took lots of drugs and it didn't hurt them at all, in fact it made them millionaires". 
i'm more preferential to the aquatic ape theory
damn, that's pathetic.
That's so sad that JRB is such a dick and genuinely seems to believe that his attitude is totally in the right.  It's true that he owns it all, but he needs to reevaluate his method of approach.  Many academics believe that knowledge should be shared, as long as it's cited.  Shouldn't he just be honored that people even want to use his music?
My name is Walter and I am about to go buy an ounce of bud. You  negative influence on society!
[](/wetodddog)
The ruling class doesn't plan conspiracies, only fundamentalist muslims in caves do.
It's just been my experience that most places don't do it right.  Could be from growing up in a small town though.
How this happened:   Bwuh, sci-fi?  Quantum?  Free online media?  Empowering seminal writers?  I bet this even has James Bond in it somewhere.  Boom, visibility.  And now for every hundred who hate this, this person is probably gaining a fan.
Sam Raimi, NPH, Scarlett Johansson, should be a mix!
The above link is lemonparty. Just so others know. You're a dick, pope.
There are many sources out there for the same info.
TY for the welcome! :)  I really appreciate this community! 
Some areas require deeper drilling than others but my understanding of lubbock is you could use a shovel and hit well water.   I'll be at work in the morning and figure it out for you so you have a descent idea of what it will actually cost.  I'm in dallas so I wont be driving a drilling rig down there because you CANT afford that and neither can i!  But I can give you a idea of cost so you don't get scalped and I even have some contacts in the lubbock area that I could refer you too.  
&gt;sells, drugs   [Like ecstasy?](http://articles.orlandosentinel.com/2002-04-17/news/0204170374_1_district-judge-roger-pensacola-crandall) &gt;pimps women   [Well, at least pimps](http://www.nydailynews.com/news/world/2010/03/05/2010-03-05_gay_prostitution_scandal_rocks_the_vatican.html)   &gt;or routinely commits murder.   [Well, I guess it wasn't routine](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Roberto_Calvi)   [Good thing the *routine* murder is in the past](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crusades#First_Crusade_1095-1099)
I wonder how it would fly if you were to say, "Whether I am or not is irrelevant to this position; I'm qualified and available today, and if you hire me I'll be loyal."   Really, I think that's an inappropriate question to ask a candidate.
They don't always make me tear up, but depending on my mood: Air of a G String by Bach  Requiem by Mozart (especially Lacrimosa)  One song that always makes me cry... [He Ain't Heavy, He's My Brother](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C1KtScrqtbc) by the Hollies  I have two brothers so I guess it just gets to me.  Every damn time.
I hate lying liars
intriguing..who is that by?
The true broker for peace in Northern Ireland was Mo Mowlam, she did all the hard work, visiting loyalist prisoners in trying to get them behind it. going face to face with convicted terrorists. She had the balls to do that, Blair wouldn't even entertain that idea. If anyone deserves that "peace" medal, it was her.
"What the *heck* was that?!"  "Ted's cholesterol level."  "...It's gone to plaid!"
Lol, I hate going to Galveston actually. I'm glad i don't actually live on the island. 
AAAAAGHHHH I missed the downer classic!?!?!  I loved that race. Brats, beer and guys going around in little circles...
yeah thats true, but i dont listen to much kurdish music 
*I'VE MADE A HUGE MISTAKE*
Check the FIFA wiki for international structure http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/FIFA#Structure   FIFA is made of CONCACAF (N.A, Carribean), UEFA (europe), CONMEBOL (S.A.),  CAF (africa), AFC (asia and Australia), OFC (new zealand and pacific islands)  FIFA - World Cup, Club World Cup, Confederations Cup (nations), and replicas of this stuff at youth and women's levels.   CONCACAF - Gold Cup (nations), Champions League (winning clubs), Superliga (lesser clubs)   UEFA - Euro Cup (nations), Champions League (winners), Europa Cup (lesser clubs)   CONMEBOL - Copa America (Nations), Copa Libertadores (clubs), Copa Sudamericana (lesser clubs..thats debatable)   CAF - African Cup of Nations (nations), African Champions League (clubs), some other shit   AFC - Asian Cup (nations), Asian Champions League (clubs), other shit. Oceania - Polynesia Cup (nations), Oceania Champions League (clubs)   Each nation has a league (and possibly lower level leagues), and a cup, and sometimes additional cups. The league is always regarded as the most important thing to win, and the Cup usually is lower on the priority list. The USA has MLS for its league, and the US Open Cup for it's cup. Winners of the league (MLS Cup) and the shield (best regular season record) get automatic qualification to the CONCACAF Champions League. MLS Cup runner up and the US Open Cup winner get to play into that tournament with a qualifier. The next 4 MLS teams get to play in the less glamorous SuperLiga. Winning CONCACAF Champions league gets you to the FIFA Club World Cup. Superliga just gets you money.   All in all, it's pretty awesome that any team from anywhere can end up world champions by proving it. Samoa FC could win the Oceania champions league, and then pull off miraculous upsets to beat major South American and European competition to win the Club World Cup.   Theoretically, you could start a team in the USA with your friends, miraculously win the US Open Cup, play in the CONCACAF Champions League, win that, and play in the FIFA Club World Cup. 
And hometown fans will even call out players who pull that crap
WEST HAMMMMMMMM 
If you read down the thread a bit, you'll see I corrected that bit and clarified. :P
It doesn't matter what you're selling, "Don't be evil" is a good motto for any business to live by. Treating your customers like "tards" (as gogglez calls them) is just bad business. 
I know, that's horrible! I'm sure the kid absolutely hates having a cartoon drawing of his face on some T-shirts, so that he'll be able to go to college or buy a yacht or something stupid like that when he grows up.
omg how did I not think of this. Or at least just a small towel rack. With this http://www.pipedreamproducts.com/showdetail.php?Full_Number=PD5056-01
&gt; He could have made a more astute argument that if you fear large levels of inflation you shouldn't invest in the soon to be debased currency, but he didn't.  Mm, definitely. Not only is investing in the soon to be debased currency risky in such situations, but buying governments bonds adds even more fuel to the fire
Thanks, does help much. But I was actually looking for the 1-58 arms guide. But either way, thanks. I'll start reading into it later.
I dunno, Zelda Spirit Tracks was pretty garbage.
But is there any discernible difference between a call at -99 dBm and -51 dBm (for the record, I don't know the answer to this)? Because if one can't tell the difference then there is no need for a distinction on the display.  Edit: This is addressed further down on this page also: http://www.reddit.com/r/gadgets/comments/ckoh4/anand_tackles_the_iphone_4_holding_issue_and/c0t9a46
she has already published pics of herself naked....who cares?
There are a lot of downsides to doing other than mark-to-market.   One is, the temptation is strong to keep assets on the books at their purchase price, even if everyone knows those prices are never coming back.  So then you're lying to yourself and everyone else about your financial condition, only everyone knows you're lying.  You can imagine that this doesn't lead to good outcomes. 
"Consider comparing the support percentages of men with names starting from the first half of the alphabet to those from the second half."   I don't think I followed this sentence.  Could you clarify? 
It's "Water, fire, air, and dirt". And now I'm ashamed of knowing this ;(
So there I was. In an Austrian whorehouse...  The captain had been talking about this place all the way across the atlantic.  At this point I had had about 9 Gossers, thanks to the hotel bar, so things weren't exactly working a 'solidly' as usual.  After turning down $90 blowjobs from a row of mediocre looking african immigrants I stumbled back to see my captain talking to a beautiful Austrian blonde.  Hey!, I shouted.  Can I have this one?  haha sure man, she's all yours.  Up I go to the second floor, hand in hand with this girl.  "Douche (shower)?" she asks.  There is a shower in the corner of the room.  I oblige.  On to the bed I go and she begins going down on me, through a condom.  I feel nothing, though I'm sporting a reasonably good chub. She says something in German.  I answer in English.  She begins getting irritated.  After 15 minutes I pull the condom and give her a wink.  She rolls her eyes and continues for about 10 seconds and looks at the time on her phone.  She says something cute in German then walks off.  So there I am.  spread eagle naked as the day I was born all alone in a room in an austrian whorehouse.  So I do what any red blooded American would do and try to finish the job.  As I'm doing this, guess who walks in?  Edit: I was 22. 
Anyong.
21, male, Florida, getting a Master's degree in Microbiology before going to medical school. What university are you working for?
My grandmother told me that as a teenager she used be told she had "cow eyes"... I guess they were big and round and brown with long lashes. I think that's a compliment!
I said "Do you love me?" And she said, "No, but that's a really nice ski mask!"
&gt; because you are incapable of admitting that one of the tenets of your religion is sexist and deplorable  Come again? I don't have a religion, the closest I could get to one is the philosophy of secular humanism.
I was informed tonight that the cop whose wife is 9 months pregnant went into labor upon hearing of he husbands murder. It's sad this got down votes, the heard mentality follows the actions of the few bad cops out there:(
[Saved to imgur](http://i.imgur.com/hZQX0.png) for posterity sake (and the inevitable (?) correction).
Good luck. Remember, "si j'avais", not "si j'aurais".  *Les scies(sawfish) ne vont pas avec les raies(manta rays)*
I said  &gt; it's impractical to run &gt;120PSI on the road  How is that "most won't let you"?
I was expecting an article.
Thank you for explaining the Riemann Sphere.   Can you do a Riemannian Manifold? (I came across this recently, and got as far as understanding what a differentiable manifold was, but no further).  Or, if it is easier, a Pseudo-Riemannian Manifold?
Are you in a relationship on facebook?  That would be kind of creepy if it pulled info from your significant other on facebook to target ads towards you as well.
Laughably you can only find the ext2 driver that barely works.  It killed the partition I had on a usb key.  Totally worthless driver.  So where is the read and write for ext 3 and ext 4?  If you cannot provide, you are a lying sob.
There is, but they ask you to turn off all electronics for take off and landing, not just airplane mode but off. I've been asked to put it away before... 
More than half of the time, actualy. I should probably look into it, but...
20/female/student in UK 
TY! Nice View! :)
The complete series of [Jeeves and Wooster](http://www.bestbuy.com/site/Jeeves+%26+Wooster%3A+The+Complete+Series+%5B8+Discs%5D+-+DVD/17723331.p?skuId=17723331&amp;ci_src=14110944&amp;ci_sku=17723331&amp;ref=06&amp;loc=01&amp;id=1959591)
Dr. Robotnik (No. Fuck your "Eggs-man". I'm old school)
do you always get angry at the truth?
&gt; Kindle owners- How can you stand sending everything you read through Amazon? That sounds like such a raw deal; what am I missing?  Ive had my kindle 2 for about 7 months now and only connected it to Amazon 1 time when I first got it to register.  
Karma for LINKS you have submitted. Self Posts do not count such as this one.
OIC you're being suspicious. Perhaps.
Pertaining to my comment: Anywhere except flagstaff, really.  I'm in Tucson though.
Isn't there some kind of law against being a predatory asshole?  What kind of "neighbor" absolutely wrecks a family's entire net worth over a few hundred bucks?  If the wife was depressed and careless, the proper response would have been some psychological help from the army and the good will of her neighbors.
There was a lifeguard where I worked who's ass hung out JUST like that...ah the memories.
I actually remember once reading this Russian short story about this guy who went crazy... at the end, they put him into a mental hospital, shaved his head and dumped cold water on him. The cold water apparently blanked his mind.  But would cold water really help like that? 
I think that meme died, because it is to much work to come up with all the different parts to make it funny.  "Yo dawg" will get upvotes too and is easier.
Meanwhile, Linux fanboys and those "I make my own computers and I am snobby as fuck about it" types get praise, even though many of them are much more rabid and judgmental then apple fans could even hope to be. I wish those people would hold themselves to the same standards they hold Apple users to.   My personal experience is this:  me: let me look that up *grabs my Macbook*  them: Oh wow, you have a Mac? You fucking fangirl...Macs are shit. Safari sucks. I build my OWN computers and run Linux. You must really like sucking Steve Jobs cock.   me: Thats great, but I love Macs, I grew up with Macs, and I [ *insert thing I like about Macs here* ] Whatever works for you though.  them: Im going to take this opportunity to tell you how stupid you are and how gay I think Apple is.   me: oh man..here we go again. *defends self more*  them: you Apple fanboys are always trying to shove how "superior" your computers are in our faces. That's why I hate Apple users.   me: Oh my god, just die. Maybe some of you guys think that Apple users are all fanboys because you are constantly telling us how much we suck, therefore some of us feel it's best to defend our interests before we get barraged with shit about how much we suck. 
You should have damaged and/or stolen the box, just for the fuuuuuuu-factor.
I'm almost positive. I've obviously never asked for anything from them or tried anything, but judging from their reputation and their "friends" I'm sure they could get it.
Actually, I can. The life of a stranger's child is has a value between fuck-all and jack shit.
I am pretty beer snob-ish.  Coors Light is my favorite shit beer.  Yea it tastes like water, but sometimes that's important.
What really helped the northern Ireland peace progress was the British army/MI5 flying its top counter insurgence people into that cliff in Scotland in a Chinook deathtrap. It sort of cleared the decks for the younger mid level officials to take over the top jobs and make progress and talks.
Barbados Slim, the only man to ever win Olympic gold medals in both limbo and sex
Ok. Thank You.
Why do they even bother having weapons at all in that show? I mean, the conclusion is always that the girl just goes and beats everyone up, against all odds, and folks act surprised. 
I'd love to play.  I'll let you know for sure if I can after you release some details on the time and my schedule is straightened out for the month.  
You could just go turn off email delivery, you know.
I'm a vegetarian and would love to be able to do this to any holier-than-thou vegan or vegetarian.
The iPod was *only* a music player and did, you know, okay. 
Just because you own a kindle doesn't mean you can't still buy books. 
I was in a hospital for a week after being deemed a threat to myself. Unfortunately I never indicated such a thing and I have a nasty hunch the hospital was milking my parents' insurance money. Their main psychiatrist called me a manipulative brat because I wanted to leave.  Sadly this is the hospital I was born in, and now it's closed due to monetary problems. I'm guessing they had monetary problems when they admitted me, as well. 
You sound stern. Do you like discipline?
I don't know about this company, but isn't chelation a valid method of ridding heavy metals and halides from your body? Using iodine for example?
That's fair.   I do have a copy of Street Fighter 4 for PS3 that I've been looking to trade for a while, so if you wanted that, it would be mighty convenient.  But other than that, here's some stuff off the top of my head I wouldn't mind trading:  360:  * Bionic Commando  * Chronicles of Riddick  * Magna Carta 2  * Ninja Gaiden 2  * Prey  PS3:  * Final Fantasy 13  * Star Wars Force Unleashed Ultimate Sith edition  * Prototype  Let me know if any of these pique your interest. Thanks!  EDIT: formatting
I did not know that book before, but looking at the Wiki entries, it seems the authenticity of her multiple personality disorder has been discredited. Edit: [This](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chris_Costner_Sizemore) is the case I know of.
I keep hearing this, but my HP printer does no such thing.  When my print cartridges get low, I find out by my pages coming out all faded. I just took out my color cartridge after it was empty and it still prints fine. It has never bitched about anything, ever.  I guess it is probably just because I installed the driver only, not any of that bloated HP shit.
The treasurer told me that Comic-Con itself sells passes--all kinds--up to and through the event, on EBay. When people return their tickets, they aren't put back up on the website.  They aren't by individual sellers, and I haven't looked for myself, but you should try there if you're interested.
Exactly. I know people ten years older than me that are just plain stupid and people ten years younger than me that are intellectually superior.
9 times out of 10, when a man keeps 'courting' a woman after she's denied his advance, it's because she lied when denying him.  Don't say you're really busy or not ready for a relationship right now if actually you just don't want to date him.
I'm going abroad to England in september for a year and I can't wait. I've heard only good things.
Fake.
I love the admission of the use of "bovine" gelatin. I'm sure many different types of cattle are used to make gelatin, but I don't see where one type of animal bones will be "more healthy" or more attractive to consumers than any other.  Let's face it, without gelatin, we wouldn't have *My Little Pony* fruit snacks, so I say... let's rack em up, boil all their bones, flavor them with fruity flavors, and distribute them in tiny foil packages. It's all about the flavor m8ys!
Mission hill.  Word.
Actually, I can. The life of a stranger's child is has a value between fuck-all and jack shit.
Meat eater: if you've just met me at dinner with mutual friends, and you think it's odd that I'm a vegetarian, please just assume I have my reasons and accept the polite answers I give to your questions.  If you think it will be funny to challenge the ignorant vegetarian on his beliefs, be prepared to look like a complete idiot.  It's an argument I don't lose, and it ends up with everyone at the table feeling guilty about their meals.  My polite dismissive answers are meant to avoid this.
Thanks, I took French so my knowledge of that particular phrase comes from rage comics. :]
Ok good point...didn't mean to slander Darth Sidious in that manner.
That's bullshit. She's still the child, and is not beyond discipline and education. I hate this wishy-washy *let them learn* attitude that has no parental influence. Instill good values in your kids, or they'll turn out like dicks, it's simple.
You scared the dick offa me!
So why is it not called /r/antitheism ? The current name is kind of misleading.
I've had great success with the Bantam Collegiate Dictionaries; they're cheap, dense, common and have some very useful grammar in the back that make them useful as a one-volume go-to for a lot of the most common problems in language learning.
Travelling in a group/tour might be a good thing to start off with, they pretty much schedule Fun Group Times, which could force you to be less socially anxious.  They're also a good way, as you say, of easing yourself into travelling.  If it helps, when I first started proper travelling, my mantra was "no regrets". I'd been to other countries before and have plenty of regrets that I didn't do stuff because I was lacking in confidence. I just started saying yes, and doing things I otherwise wouldn't. If people invite you into a conversation, do it, if they invite you to join them for a bit, do it.  Good luck, and *go* it will never be a mistake. :)
It's buried under a big T.
Thank you for conceding.  I thought you never would accept that the question defines the answer.
Passion and 15 second long exposures, difficult combination .. but I'd say considering, I did pretty well =)
&gt;providing the context that a majority of muslims cannot understand the prayers they hear or say   Isn't this widely known? My bad. I didn't mean to leave that out.  &gt;In any case this whole discussion is beside the point, because death for apostacy is written in Koran. They can't edit the word of "God" so they are stuck with it now. Any weaseling out of that injunction needs more sophistication than what you are displaying here. Try moar.  Weasel out of what?
His name is Robert Paulson.
It seems like it would require a lot more money to open an original restaurant.   All the same, I don't feel bad. If you didn't participate in the loss leader deals, I would tell you to fuck yourself. If things are going to start getting expensive, I will do all my fast food shopping at Whataburger.
Meh, I dont mind pissing off the hive mind....thanks for the info tho.
Did you send away for the deleted chapter?
LMAO
His theme song immediately started playing in my head when I loaded that gif.  Thank you.
She leaves for London in September. Some of the best advice I ever got was never date with an end day in sight.  You're assuming she's going just to hook up with foreign boys. We both don't do random hookups, but even if she did, it'd be purely physical. I'm not worried.  Nobody's saying it's gonna work, but I think study abroad (at least at our college age) is one of those things where a break is okay. Necessary, almost. What's the saying? If you love someone, let them go...and if they come back, their love was yours? Hokey, yeah, but at our age it's important that we have the opportunity to change without an agenda.
"Maximizing the log" comes from information theory (and in fact encompasses a fatal flaw of most risk management methods derived from or akin to it).  Entropy or information is given as \sum_{i=0}^n p(x_i) log(p(x_i)).  This is where the "log" comes from.  (I suck at LaTeX so bear with).  The greatest entropy occurs when all p(x_i) are exactly equal and thus the individual event probabilities are independent of one another.  This is also called "maximum entropy".  Also the maximum randomness condition (or "white noise").  This is also the maximally unpredictable state - predictability implies structure rather than randomness.  *If you presume that risk is the case where you know the least, then maximally random/entropic is the worst-case scenario of any unknown case* because maximum randomness is the most unstructured (and unpredictable) ensemble of states. So if you maximize the utility function of a stochastic system, you have obtained the maximal risk variance by presuming maximum entropy.  This is how you end up with "maximizing the log of something".  The problem is that you can't blithely (and correctly) assume many of the critical requirements of maximum entropy in economic systems.  Namely presuming economic event (transactions, decisions, etc.) independence is generally a wrong assumption.  What can occur is scale-free and multi-scale phenomena which don't have this statistic and actually get discarded when you assume maximum entropy.  This would be the "maximum correlative cascade" case instead where events are not even independent and uncorrelated but have a very definite non-independence.
The worst part is they use Ok and Cancel. You have to read the message to figure out which button makes it all go away. Often times they both lead you into hell..  (btw if anyone goes to this actual website, theres even a voice that nags you on top of the popup)  btw who would lay down all that money for an iphone just to install android on it...? I'm not saying either is better. but android is cheaper, just get an android phone...
where do you find a dog with no legs? right where you left it!
**[I gar-on-tee!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Justin_Wilson_(chef)**  **`i fuckin HATE wiki urls, with their stupid parenthesii!!`**
&gt;from maxwellhill [M] via environment sent 16 hours ago Nope - won't do it until you apologize for being rude and demanding... and now vindictive!  Please expound on this?  What did you say?  Be honest.  Also, I don't understand exactly what was caught in the spam filter?  
I think he's already kicked the smokes for some type of makeover project with Salon. Not sure about the booze though.
The money wasn't loaned by the U.S. in the first place. It was loaned by private investors in the bond markets, and those private investors have always been paid back. There's nothing for the U.S. to "forgive."
I felt bad after reading your expla, so I upvoted both these comments.
That's how I grew up playing basketball. We hung random wooden baskets from laundry lines and used 99 cent plastic balls from the dollar store because we couldn't afford a real basketball. I also broke a few windows playing baseball with a rock and a stick, and subsequently ran for my life to avoid a beating by the same stick. Fun times. 
[lol](http://www.product-reviews.net/wp-content/userimages/2007/11/madeleinemccann-1.jpg)
I think so, I also noticed it with my Desire.  I got the crap scared out of me the first time I got a message after the update.
grammar*
&gt;&gt; What? I've done a 90kloc 30-threads c++ app last year and worked without a hitch, because I used the right abstractions.  &gt; Ah I guess you come from some bizarro world where threading in imperative languages is easy and mundane.  Don't project your deficiency to others.  I can confirm it's just you; concurrent programming is not that hard once you master a few facts.
A lot of good people need those ads to keep there site running. I support adblock for some of the more outrageous sites but most small sites need to show ads.
Fight it, Mr. Hitchens. Win, if you can. Write about it, should you feel the urge. I'll tell you now, I'm a better man for having read you. -- Fellow Mammal.  P.S. Should anyone say you must have a lot of faith to be an atheist, tell them that's like saying you must eat a lot of meat to be a vegetarian.
I want to say thanks to Tony Blair! If it wasn't for him, we wouldn't have a peace process here in Northern Ireland. He and Clinton were a winning combination, especially with Mo Mowlam in the bear-pit, banging her wig on the table in front of our "politicians". It all went awry when Bush came in and TB thought it would just continue. Then 9/11 happened and it changed everyting.
You accidentally the whole site.
maybe they are coming from a far away land
I went to a massage place with my cousin recently.  It wasn't one of those happy ending places, but it was pretty shady.  The massage itself was like $25 bucks, and they had a mandatory tip of $10 bucks.  That was just so unheard of.  I charged the $25 bucks, and after they had demanded the $10 tip, I just walked out.  That's like asking for Christmas presents from random people.
That's when the Math department calls up the Law department asks how many students want guaranteed good grades on their math courses past, present, and future.
[Wonder no more.](http://www.google.com)
holy shit!
That's awesome. I think I need to get one when I have some cash.
I've seen it.  Fine, you get the Veyron, I'll get the [SSC Ultimate Aero.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1x4d02uEZws)
Trigun carries some of the same scifi western feel as Cowboy Bebop, but although it takes place on a future human colony planet, there isn't really any ship-to-ship combat.  The space angle only shows up in the latter end of the series.
Many soups are pretty easy to make, and so delicious.  Such as black bean soup, potato soup, or corn chowder.
Seven. The guy strapped to a bed for a year really played on my mind. I think that was the power of that film that it showed you aftermath, explained what happened and then let your imagination fill in the gaps.
the peace prize is a controversial and highly political prize, the Nobel prize for economics is a science prize. They are not comparable in anyway. 
Something like [this](http://imgur.com/iGtN0)? I don't know what all those extra icons are on the one you posted, but I'm assuming they are just launchers. Also don't know what the base, main, and extra are, but if its a pager then it'll take about 5 seconds to add to the current one I just posted.
Tutorial.
I guess that's why I like prog and other more experimental music...
Last whisper and some MR would be a good counter to it right?
The battery compartment is in the back.  And it fits 4.
hey! I know you guys! well I know brian. hey brian.
CARL HEROLD?  I am Skeleton Herold?  No!  I am Skeleton Jelly!
Wear a fez..fezzes are cool
When you're 30 you'll be happy to be thought of as 25!
Do we have the same friends, or do our friends have the same dog? http://www.flickr.com/photos/harleyb/4409493418/in/set-72157623561389620/
It's not news unless the police kill someone, on camera.   Next week we'll all be worrying about something else and the police know it.   In fact, they  depend upon it.
Because it's not reasonable to come up with a probability of being gay unless explicitly specified. It is reasonable to come up with the probability of being born on a Tuesday (1/7), just as it's reasonable to come up with the probability of being a boy (1/2).
Good for you! FF still is the best.
What kind of crazy fuckwad would do that?
That's why I cited the specific paper and authors. I assumed (incorrectly it seems) that redditors are clever enough to use google on their own. Mordakaida also provided a link for you.  There is lots of other reserach out there too, which I encourage you to look for if you're curious. In a nutshell though, while the end of life costs at the end of a smoker's life are indeed greater than end of life costs at the end of a non-smoker's life, you are probably not considering two key factors:  1 - smokers by and large pay a hell of a lot more tax than non-smokers.  2 - non-smokers live much longer after retirement age and are thusly a drain on the system for a greater length of time.
Which part of the EIA report being a prediction based on *current* trends do you not understand?  Which part of wind being part of the total renewable solution do you not understand?  You really are amazingly ignorant for someone who pretends to be interested in this subject!
If you go to http://www.truegalaxies.com/how-to-connect  the anh client should streamline the proccess.
I think it's more that the testing isn't culturally appropriate.  There's always a fear of race bias and class bias when it comes to administering IQ tests even in the US.  It's hard to make a standardized test when the background and experience of each individual varies so greatly.  IQ is supposed to quantify the capacity to learn.  It can't do that if the question is unfairly written (even if it's unintentional).  Finding a way to make these tests bias-free is very, very difficult. 
It's an unfair question because Tara is *supposed* to be annoying; they actually brought in Rutina Wesley after the pilot to replace the previous Tara (Brooke Something) because she wasn't annoying *enough*.  And Lettie Mae is supposed to be so horrible that the audience would rush to Tara's side. Good job of it too, tho the character is a bit superficial.  Sookie is my pick for most annoying because she's a somewhat bland, otherwise overidealized heroine, with [Mary Sue](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mary_Sue) traits. I don't know if this is because of author proxy or audience pandering.  Tara was actually my favorite for the first two seasons, but the character has been a drag in recent episodes. I hope this turns around.  N.B.  I've not read the books, and have avoided Wikipedia so I don't hit plot spoilers.
God works in mysterious ways.
lame, ppl need to figure out a different way to make money. ip is only going to get easier to copy.
You ever hear of the economist who predicted twelve of the last 3 recessions? 
Modern (Keynes-brainwashed) economists equate deflationary period with an economic depression.  In fact, wealth increased during the periods following the panics even though - and precisely because these were deflationary periods following an economic correction.  For example, during the panic of 1837,   &gt;"real consumption increased by 21 percent and real gross national product increased by 16 percent, despite the fact that real investment fell by 23 percent and the money supply shrank by 34 percent" (p 102 http://mises.org/books/historyofmoney.pdf)
This isn't new.
What about the people who are not a part of the anarchist majority mob consensus. Those who have a different belief. Are they not then subject to the tyranny of the anarchist mob?
The same with the AT4. The concussion just fucks you up inside.
Hey! I was just looking for a title for [this picture](http://imgur.com/XWBzF.jpg) I made. Thanks, OP!
Entrevista do Blog CMMI sobre Six Sigma para TI
&gt; also very young, though not as young as Özil  Özil is 21, Müller is 20.
Oh hell yes.
BAWLINNNNN'!
LOL
&gt; The Sentra is such a smooth ride and it doesn't come very expensive.  I know. I'm driving a 2008 Sentra now. Got 30,000 miles on it. Gotta get the tires replaced on it soon.
If you were Capt Mike Clauer, how would you react to your wife when you found out she didn't pay the HOA bills?
is anybody invited?
I wish you had phrased that differently. Nobody wants to think about getting raped on razor blades.
Revolution is My Name
[This guy beat you to it](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fvUQQF5S4Dg).
Amelia Earhart is on the other side.
You seem to know what you're talking about. So what IS a date rape drug?  And where can I get some?
***Watch the NYE fire works on the harbour**  Make sure you plan a spot and get there early, most of the city turns out for fireworks and its not uncommon for people to camp out at the good spots for hours.
Ok thank you.
I also have two assholes...one only comes out on the internet
I'm gonna go look...
I have done Ju-Jutsu in Sweden. Didn't really get me in shape, lots of standing around watching the trainer and carefully learning technique. Ofc it depends on the trainer. A particular lady drove me to see black dots in front of my eyes.   I'm actually gonna start MMA/Shootfighting this fall, I love grappling so picking it over muay thai.
use finger puppets, that might be simple enough
[Obligatory classic](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qItugh-fFgg)
this.
Thanks! I can't believe all the love my sleeping furball is getting :D
Sorry to be a polemical dick but I just need to correct a few things there. What economists found is that anything "luxury" is often elastic - as there are substitutes and buyers have no OBLIGATION per se to buy. So while it is "moralistically" sound to tax luxury boats in reality the rich man can always chose simply not to buy, or to buy a ferrari instead. Your tax will make very little revenue because it crushes demand. It will ruin the luxury boat industry and give rise an angry mob of jobless workers who will riot because they were unfairly punished. (This has happened in the 70s before but I can't be arsed finding you a citation.)  Compare that to inelastic things like alcohol and cigarettes. Because they are socially ingrained, habit forming and no really viable substitutes exist, taxes do not damage demand. Which is good because your sinners will all begrudgingly pay your sin tax, which nets you a LOT of revenue.   What arealreactionary got fundamentally wrong is that when governments introduce sin taxes - while they will put the moralistic banner to push these things through - they're really in it for the money. Sin taxes bring in a LOT of steady money, and it is AGAINST the gov's interests for demand to decrease because that will damage their bottom line.
Middle school.
I go to a Catholic school and mmmghfghhmph.
have you tried it?
* Wade - Miami * Lebron - New York * Bosh - Chicago / Miami * Dirk - Miami / Phoenix * Amare - New York  * Johnson - Miami / New York   I think there will be a big 3 in Miami
You have to realize though that a delivery driver's speed of service also includes the kitchen staffs'. If they take their sweet ass time or if the customer's order must be remade for some reason the driver would be unfairly punished 
I enjoyed the song and the magma / nature clips but honestly, the club girls kinda took me out of it. (Its just that those clips were shot / edited in a completely unoriginal way, IMO... almost like a cheesy girls gone wild preview or something.)  Over all, I liked it!
Take time to realize.. - Colbie Caillat
I feel it is my duty to point out to anyone reading this comment, that there is an awesome remix of the castle theme from Super Mario World in the Pictogrid game.  It's like the 3rd or 4th track.
*Mind Blown*
What i do know is that the literacy rate in America has improved since. The Economics have improved multiple folds. The law enforcement agencies are alot better equipped. I am not sure if you follow soccer, but if everything the humans do is based on historical experiences, Americans would never send their team ever again in the next world cup. It was amazing to see how a country which said "who gives a fuck about soccer" transformed into "Go USA GO". If you failed in doing something good the first time, keep trying until you get it right, that's all i am saying.
What do you think will be the next big technological failure? You know, so I can invest in the company that makes it.
care to share yours?
Unless your day job involves said data structures it may be difficult to recall them in the heat of the moment.
Probably? I'll definitley post here on reddit. No worries.
I think you should "customise" it a bit then hand it back if they ever return, telling them very politely to fuck off and never come back.
probably pipe tobacco because I smelled some that this old man was smoking and it was a delight.
its one of my favorite compliments, because when my friend first said it i had the most wonderful "WTF?" moment, then she explained, and it was pretty much what you described there. I love my cow lashes.
It's just trying too hard to be different. I call it "Egotecture".   It looks like a jarring and hostile space to live in. One that manages to make 'sterile' intrusive.  It violates the streetscape and seems like it would impose itself on pedestrians through its' self-assertion.   It is "stunning" only insofar as it is a travesty of the notion that buildings nurture the inhabitants and contribute to their surroundings.  I would love to hear from the Bilzen townsfolk as to how they view this. 
Ah, so it's different from device to device? Good to know.  So you need to "root" first (still don't know exactly what that means,) then the world's your oyster.  Thanks man.
Ha, well I want a larger fraction.  I could be her personal assisstant...
andrealemur
[http://www.myfantasyleague.com](http://www.myfantasyleague.com) is what we're are going to be switching to this season. It allows you to fully customize your league and is probably the best out there. They will even let you run a trial and test it out. We used to use fanball but they have been getting worse and worse every season.
&gt; If you guys couldn't survive a few miles, how will you survive another crisis (and there will be others).  My wife and I survived 10,000 miles, but I see your point.
While I'm more inclined to agree with you, your analogies are just absolutely retarded. I download as much as the next person, but. Your shed analogy makes no goddamn sense to me. It's not like when you steal music you compose and produce an album yourself that is an exact replica of the thing that's floating around on the internet. It's not like fucking radiohead lives next door, and is recording a song in the backyard, and you're sitting in your backyard, and you record your own version of the song and then listen to it on your computer, and then one of them hears it, and walks over with a guitar and smashes the shit out of your computer and then beats you repeatedly in the face. You're not downloading instructions on how to staff and film and score a fucking movie. You're downloading the movie and you're watching the movie, END OF STORY. This involves you doing ZERO WORK and contributing NOTHING. I'm ok with that. But don't make it sound like you're contributing to the creative dialog when you absolutely aren't.
Tuesday was explicitly stated by the precondition. Weekday was not stated anywhere.
Also consider adding a protein supplement at least.  It'll help maximize protein intake without making you eat as many calories.
I think that people use the word "append" to mean "append" and insert to mean insert at an arbitrary point.  http://msdn.microsoft.com/en-us/library/bb383995.aspx  http://docs.python.org/library/array.html#array.array.insert  http://ruby-doc.org/core/classes/Array.html#M002172
That's the American Atheists logo. Wish the military didn't use that.  Also, you can have a grave marker even if you're cremated (in military cemetaries)
The "usual advice" isn't for getting your friend back. It is for getting over an ex. Even if you are doing better, there is nothing to say he will ever be as comfortable with you as he once was. I am so sorry you are going through this. Maybe after lots more time you guys can recover. But you need to start looking to replace this anchor in the meantime. 
Terror and Hubris
Stop overthinking it.  While you're analyzing your option &amp; building up a strategy this popular guy is making the moves on 'your' girl.  Just fucking talk to her and get it over with.  In high-school relationships, 11 days is *forever* - waiting that long could quite possibly result in you losing all your chances.  As for the appropriateness of asking her over IM vs. in-person, who cares?  You're not asking her to marry you, you're just asking her to spend some time with you.  Don't worry about the future &amp; how things will work in the long-run until you actually get to know her better &amp; see how you guys interact.  Maybe you won't like her, maybe you will.  The only certainty is that she won't be the person that you've imagined in your head running through all these long-term scenarios.  In short - don't wait, don't worry about the future, use whatever means you have available to actually spend time with her IN PERSON.
Let's not forget the 'soul-crushing experience' of shopping at Target.  [Sometimes this is all you can say](http://imgur.com/TRTAJ.jpg)
Yeah man!  I can't believe a festival of that magnitude only cost me $20 (presale).  God bless those guys for finally getting Houston a great music festival.  It was a considerably better than it was last year, with respect to the acts and organization of the event.  I especially loved seeing local legends Bun B and Slim Thugga there this year.  Also, "In the Morning of the Magicians" was one of the most beautiful live experiences I've ever had.  This is only the 2nd year, so I definitely see FPSF advancing toward the likes of Bonnaroo, Coachella, ACL, Lollapalooza in the future.  I hope it stays cheap.
Sounds like Nelson needs to throw his medal off the bridge. 
That's part of the image they're selling. When I think "Old Spice", I think "*That's what my dad used when I was a kid*". The makers of "Old Spice" are capitalizing on that memory by telling me "*Yes, real men use it. Your dad used it because he was a man. You want to be a man? You should use it too.*"  It's brilliant marketing. 
Impossible, he isn't even *wearing* boots.
Where Mr Cannon,  do you actually find this crap?
&gt;I think love is arguably a delusion. Love at first sight yes I would agree. Love between a couple after decades together... hmm not so much. I don't think there is a parity there at all. &gt;It's perfectly natural and normal to grieve for a stillborn child. Is it desirable? That's up to the individual, but even if you don't see it that way, I'd hope you'd at least be able to see why others might. Of course I can see why it might help others. Though I think it would be helpful to not fall into the trap of letting the tremendously strong bonding emotions felt (for good reason historically) be interpreted for anything deeper. If it helps someone to think of it as a lost child on parity with the say a child of 10 with a _real_ personality, wants, desires, etc then by all means go ahead. I just can't put myself in that mindset. Too dependent on evidence and facts I guess...
"Do you want some cream" "Uhhmmm... no that's alright."
Thanks for that ... time to get reading!
I hear you sister, but then I bet you appreciate a sleek &amp; muscular stallion (or filly) as opposed to a work horse, as well.  Edit: And not in a horse blanket...
A stretched one if he was doing it right...
Go on.
*WHOOSH*
Sounds like you're a sort of a deist. Most of the Founding Fathers were deists, which is cool.
&gt;I don't assume that I will retain anything about my former self if there is an afterlife. I don't rule out some form of reincarnation or something similar where my next form is different.  This is something I've never understood. I've heard something similar from Christians when I ask them how they can believe in a heaven where they believe they will be happy while at the same time claim that there is a hell where people they know are being tortured forever. It's a matter of cognitive dissonance. If you retain nothing about who you are or are changed sufficiently that it's essentially impossible to determine that you were you, why does this possibility of an afterlife matter?
He doesn't even walk in those 5 seconds, just moves his upper body slightly. I'm still impressed even if he's not able to walk with it, I just want to know if it is possible.
Rape is in the air.
this whole movie had me in tears :(
[Man with No Name - Teleport](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=PoVTOOKWIBg)  Nothing beats goa...
If I was in school...Summer sucks, man.:/
The proper noun Nazi in me really wants to correct this.
HOLY SHIT, I thought no fucking way photoshop does that, so I found a pic of some bills in google images and tried to copy and paste into CS5 and it gave me a "this software does not support the editting of banknotes" message.
What are you missing out on? It's just a phone.
I have that one too, my only issue was that it picks up everything. I constantly have my fan running and I was unbearable to people listening to me. I had a little foam cover for the mic from my old headset that fixed the problem, but without it I would have had to get a different headset.
It's not an assumption. The precondition explicitly states that day matters.
Well put, and good research. Thanks. I think everyone needs to read your response and THINK.
You are correct.
done
fucking hysterical. I wonder if Michael is looking up from hell at this as we speak? lol just kidding, there is no hell of course ;)
yes
When I delivered pizza I was given a per delivery gas/maintenance fee. Use to be 1$ per house.  This was on top of a decent hourly wage.   Then they changed the gas $$$ to something else...don't quite remember this was back in 1999.
lol..nice.
I get "shockingly blue eyes", but it's apparently more of a blueberry colour. People ask if I have coloured contacts, too. I think it's mostly when I wear a couple of colours in particular, like teal.
http://www.sourcewatch.org/index.php?title=Monsanto_and_the_Roundup_Ready_Controversy  One example. Think about it from an evolutionary standpoint.  "lets make a crop that's utterly dependent on one type of herbacide and cant protect itself without it!"
A sloe comfortable screw against the wall. This is a real drink.  I just can't remember all the ingredients.  I believe there are five.
Cocaine is a hell of a drug.
Well, the vast majority of marijuana smokers in this country probably aren't using it as medicine, and many of those who are, have legal recourse already. I don't take issue with medical marijuana.  Stoners, and by that I mean people who smoke or talk about smoking ALL THE FRACKING TIME annoy me. I don't want to hear about their obsession. I don't like the culture that I see that seems to go along with weed. The cries of "make it legal man" simply annoy me, and since it isn't something I'm interested in, I'd just rather not hear about it.  Oh yeah, and don't go putting words in my mouth. 
Required reading when I majored in El. Ed. (circa 1975ish)  http://www.preservenet.com/theory/Illich/Deschooling/intro.html  Not that I am a supporter of "home schooling" as I see it practiced today. I call that "home indoctrination".  Liberal parents, with open minds yeah, religious wackos, not so much. The former can accept their offspring coming to their own conclusions, the latter want drones. Just my 2 cents.  That is why "socialization", exposure to different perspectives is so important, as big a failure as the public schools are, they are not as nearly as bad as some make them out to be. Including dear old Ivan.
I just visited the US.  About half my friends have been directly or indirectly employed by the construction industry.  Almost all of them are now on unemployment, and the three that aren't are now underemployed.  Think how much better off everyday Americans would be if those war dollars were spent on reconstruction of US infrastructure like levees, bridges, high-speed rail systems, ecological city planning, etc. instead of funneling it into the hands of the war profiteers.
This is because we have different standards for men and women.   What both words have in common is that they are intended to shame a person for sexual choices that deviate from our cultural standards.  Where they differ points to how our standards for men and women differ.
Assbert and Reamer give it two thumbs deep down.
not even like once a month or something extremely low like that?
The Joker is perhaps the most pure form of evil there is, in my opinion.  He doesn't seek to gain anything. He doesn't try to convince others his plans are righteous. He doesn't even try to convince himself.  He knows what he's doing. He's a genuine force of madness.
I'd pay to see that punch.  [edit]Well, stream it, probably.
Having to entertain unsuggested hypotheticals to keep the logic from falling apart is the sign of a bad script.
Do an "IAMA [AMA](http://www.ama-assn.org/)".
Really? I don't think [all](http://www.amazon.com/Hamilton-Beach-40729-Espresso-Maker/dp/B0028YRFCW/ref=sr_1_7?ie=UTF8&amp;s=home-garden&amp;qid=1277942647&amp;sr=1-7) espresso machines are expensive. The low end ones are not significantly more expensive than any other kitchen appliance (toaster oven for example).
It doesn't go into a suspend state unless it's a new app (compiled for IOS4), and even then, it's wiped from RAM as soon as memory runs out, so it really shouldn't be slowing anything down.
i love sigur ros, but i think the videoclip from "svefn-g-englar" is incredible... personally, the most emotional videoclip i ever saw:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sWiJWLiSKro
Come on, the logographic instructions are *completely* clear:  1.  Eat a warm cupcake. 2.  Build a teepee. 3.  Ask Kilroy to hold his left hand over his head. 4.  Park. 5.  Aim at your target. 6.  Collapse the tree node.  See?  Clear and simple!  
That's a good point. The Queen would want you to stop bogarting that stuff.
...PROBLEM? [](/troll)
This is not true. The charge is for parking. There is a multitude of other charges in the visitor center if you like, but spend 10 mins there at most if you must. I would suggest for ice-cream if the sun dares to shine. Also, if you want to seem like a complete moron, or are afraid of showing your children anything real, you could pay to see a multimedia presentation and a "3D virtual cliff-side experience". EVERYTHING in the gift shops are overpriced and can be gotten elsewhere for less and more importantly, when you aren't next to some really amazing views. tldr; The charge is for parking.
Came here to recommend this.  I've been working my way through the _entire_ Discworld series on audiobook.  It's taking quite some time.  
2000 ford escort, I'm gonna run it into the ground before I ever get a new car.
Ever consider that you just don't get it, *man*?
The train gods are pleased by this submission.
hahah spilled my coffee lol
My SO and I think it happened because the garbagemen didn't remove our trash (and the other two apartments in our buildings' trash) for at least two weeks. There were flies everywhere and they were closest to the window that is right above the trashcans. 
It means he probably doesn't know what he's talking about.  Also, I think [this old thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/PhilosophyofScience/comments/9ysap/g%C3%B6dels_theorems_myths_and_misconceptions_a/) is relevant.
and THIS is why I will never, never, never join an HOA. One of them, anyway
Well, it couldn't have been hard to figure out where they were going.
[Multi-track drifting!](http://imgur.com/VSjYM.jpg)
&gt;You'd be insane to not admit that the single hugest difference between an MC68000 and a Core i7 isn't clock speed.  I'm not saying it makes no difference, I'm just saying that showing a graph and going look, look, computers aren't getting faster is moronic.   The CPU speeds have been growing steadily, and even if silicon has hit a limit, which apparently it hasn't as Intel is promising 10GHZ next year, there are plenty of other things to improve meanwhile. So, on a short timescale clock speeds aren't a good measure, and on a large scale there's already plenty of technologies lined up to pick up the slack.  Do you seriously think that there will be no increase in clock speeds in the same time span it took to go from MC68000 to Core i7?
Tell her Darragh says hello. Here's a photographer that might interest you, http://tinyurl.com/37zjksd  http://www.moma.org/visit/calendar/exhibitions/119 http://www.moma.org/collection/artist.php?artist_id=8194
fake. 
that's the nicest, smoothest, cleanest looking cock I have ever seen. I wouldn't mind sucking that.
You're dumb. Before you whine, don't sign the contract. It states everything in the contract. Why did you move in agree to those terms then start whining? 
The calculations for the test rankings are well documented, and can be read up on [Wikipedia.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/ICC_Test_Championship#Test_championship_calculations)   Even though BCCI definitely influenced the decision to ban NZ players, the ICC wanted it as well as they thought the ICL would start milking a cow they didn't even have at that point. Also, Shane Bond himself could've just chosen to not join the ICL, if he *really* wanted to play for his country that bad. But he did not. Why? Because in the end, it's all about the money.
Burgerking is the only nationwide chain whose food actually tastes like burgers I may have grilled up myself.
Where? The predator dog? Thats no zergling. 
Direct-Marketing Landing pages are usually pretty scummy...  
Weed only has good heath and social benefits because I have to justify my vice to myself and the people around me.
AWESOME!
Yes, Rand ostracized almost everyone that mildly deterred from her beliefs. That doesn't change the fact that her philosophy is incredibly compatible with libertarianism. Especially since both her and Rothbard held the non-aggression principle as the cornerstones of their philosophy.
I was imagining a secret ritual, but you are right that a public display, as a threat, would be a moral violation. In a private ceremony, where burning the cross intends to boost moral and fuel hatred, are they violating a moral code? From my view, it only polarizes already held beliefs: you and I will be more disgusted by their actions, Klan members will be further set against minorities. I would agree that intentionally escalating emotions, when hoping to cause amoral physical action, is a moral violation. But the onus still lies on us all to resist fleeting emotions in our actions; the violation of burning a cross is drastically less than any sort of discrimination.
ahh, so I guess that means it's like... just a way of differentiating between one and the other.  okay, well that makes more sense then; thanks!  edit: oh, but wait, why do we say that we know the "older" can't be a girl?  the problem only says you know one isn't a girl, right?  so couldn't it also be the "younger" that's not a girl?  I mean, I think those two situations are mutually exclusive, so it would still be probability 1/3, but why assume that the "older" is male and not the "younger"?
That will help me, but not them.
This is why Reddit has been slow all this time.
Ted Nugent is a second class human and and a bottom-rung musician. He hunts on farms (very impressive), and has no political analysis beyond his love of his phallic symbols.
you should click on the out-of-state link i provided above
Hey!! a negative 4 seemed bad enough! :p
That ugly rumour of a W shaped recession. 
Have you always done transitions in your other videos like you did with this one? I noticed quite a few here, and I really liked the transition to the KillCam at the end.
I am eyeing a Desire so damn much...
I'd ask for my money back (giving him the food back) and never order from there again.
Nah. I just got the game for PC today, the default sensitivity is *way* too high.
haha fuck i was going to write that, you beat me to it.
Ranma 1/2, mostly for nostalgia reasons.  It's lighthearted and silly, and never pretends to be anything else.
the big problem is that for MLS teams, our season runs March - November. CONCACAF Champions League goes August - May. In the group stages, MLS teams are in form. In the knockout stages, our guys haven't played recent competitive matches. 
aye, any bartender worth his salt should be able to make one.  If he can't, he has no right to call himself a bartender. 
99% of internet comments are garbage   99.9% of ALL comments are garbage   99.99% of somments people choose not to make are garbage   So the internet is *ahead* by up to .9% (edit: arithmetic)
You must be female
&gt; In general, though, I feel like female characters who openly make a living by swinging a sword are far more common in roleplaying than they ever would have been in history, and are often accepted without comment or question by the other characters they meet.  Pretty much this. A certain degree of chauvinism is pretty much inevitable in any society that has agriculture, given that on average men are physically stronger (and thus better adapted to most forms of combat), and that women are severely constrained by pregnancy. Pregnancy is necessary to keep population levels up, especially with the high infant mortality rates of pre-scientific societies, and it also effectively incapacitates a woman for months at a time. Sociologically, there were good reasons behind the idea that women shouldn't be fighting and adventuring, although they were blown all out of proportion by most societies. For the sake of survival in early agricultural communities, the job of women was making babies. (The fact that they got no *respect* for that all-important task is a different problem entirely.) The idea of absolute equality is a modern thing, and could only arise in a society that is largely post-agricultural and has the medical science to ensure that most children will live to adulthood. I'd say that it's a good change, but the fact that gender equality is the norm in the quasi-medieval worlds of most fantasy settings is quite frankly implausible.  As for disability: it depends on what sort of disability you're looking for. Most obvious physical or mental handicaps would disqualify someone from adventuring right off the bat. I mean, would *you* want to go dungeon-running with an epileptic sorcerer? One *color spray*, and you're picking up the flambe'd bits of your party members off the wall. Not to say that he wouldn't be an interesting character, but in terms of RP qualifications for the adventurer's life, most groups would throw that guy out on his ass rather than risk their own hides.
wow, is that a helmet cam from one of the spacesuits?
What if you're like me and you don't drink?
you live in a dorm with a child?
I will be one of the people who have never played it and only played SP on SC/SC:BW. I am just hoping from all the Day9 and videos I watch will translate over.
Kefka
Dain bramage?
&gt; They would catch the friend  Well you're an optimist, aren't you.
The troll in me wants to upvote this but the problem is that there is no designation for what he does with the product after he buys it. Purchasing a 50 dollar gift card will just allow the OP to buy whatever he would have bought anyway.
How in the hell would that help Nigerian team to perform better in the next coming Africa cup or world cup if they are suspended for two years, where's the logic in that ?????
A bikeway just opened up near where I live.  It is only 1.5 miles long, but it will be extended to 3.3 miles.  Driving on it is truly an eerie and wonderful feeling.  Segmented from the roads, it feels so safe, quiet, and fun.  You can get decent speed on it.  If it was for a commute it would really fast.  Before, I wanted all roads to have a bike lane, now I think intelligently designed communities have a network of bike paths through hem.  Whats even more interesting is that there is a 15 mile trail being built that will connect to this one, and it takes the path very close to where I live.  That segment will go under the power lines.  There was a lot of legal wrangling over liability, but eventually the power company and local government worked something out.  They're building it in 2011.  Until you've been on something like this, you just can't see how bike travel could be.
You have the Spirit of the Calling, just like other neo-Founding Fathers such as Timothy McVeigh, Theodore Kaczynski, Randy Weaver, David Koresh, et al.  And you will walk their same paths.  Lead the way!
Do you ever intend on being married?  I understand not pushing the issue, but assuming you found the right woman would you want that lifestyle?  There is nothing wrong with staying single though.  I feel as though around your early 40's you will start to really reduce the possibility of finding a woman without a lot of baggage so you may be approaching a time to either fish or cut bait.
Why don't you have a seat over here?
Well, my current favourites are Mumford and Sons, it's not the same vibe but I'm liking what they've got, especially Little Lion Man.   Bat for Lashes are awesome, if you're not in the UK I don't think you'd know about her? Fur and Gold is my preferred album, Prescilla, The Bat's Mouth, and Horse and I, are personal favourites.   Santogold is a keeper, as is MIA, whom I'm sure you've heard. Fleet Foxes also have a really good vibe.   Laura Marling does some crazy good work (Ghosts is good). Bon Iver, Skinny Love, remains to be one of my favourite songs of all time.   The XX are awesome.   Antony &amp; the Johnsons 'I am a bird now' is a wonderful and strangely powerful album.   Everyone should have this, but you need some of The Cure, it's pretty genius.   My Delirium by Lady Hawke is a good car song.   And a curveball, the Hot 8 Brass Band, do some pretty strange but wonderful covers. Sexual Healing is my favourite, give it a chance, I found myself bemused at first and dancing like a mad woman at the last. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s75WIkQBYzk
I have experience drumming on the bar/pedestals after-hours.  I think I can actually pull this off...
It saps your energy.  Your body uses its energy reserves to keep up its core temperature, and you calm down (physically) from simple exhaustion.  Doesn't necessarily make you any less angry, but you do get more controllable.
Opinions on the government, pro-nazi beliefs, instructions on bomb making, **LINE**, hating on OoT.
That would be the recently captured Russian spy named Anna Chapman.  Very hot indeed
im using the razer carcharias and it is fantastic, very comfortable good mic attached and the sound quality is awesome perfect for gaming
I just came back from Beijing last month, it was amazing! Most of the food is delicious, but the best places to eat are the ones that are just tiny, family run hole-in-the-wall. 
Link's Awakening was awesome.  I'm too young to have played the original, but when I was ten my parents bought me a Game Boy Color and the DX edition.  I'll never forget Christmas 1998.
The sound of the priest haunts me to this day.  Stealing all my Choson Legions one by one!!!
&gt;Most wheels/tires wont let you go past 120PSI, but if they say you can, you still probably shouldn't (even if you are a clydesdale).  Because I'm pretty sure you tacked on that last part in your edit.
Yes. Google for "Bell's Inequality."  While I've summarized it in a way that might be arguable, it's basically saying "we have experimentally determined that important information about reality really, really isn't there until you measure it."  So it's factually incorrect to say "A=A regardless of whether you know it or not."  As for relativity, you can't even tell what order events happened in, if the events are physically far enough away from you.  And not just "you can't tell" but also "the question is meaningless."  There is no right answer to "did A happen before B" for some combinations of A and B. For some, the answer is both yes and no.
I see what you did there 
Yeah at first I though Marlo brought nothing but mean, but thinking about how much he accomplished while bringing so little attention, I realized he is one smart and cunning bastard.
Did the power go out and you had to systematically kill all the patients in order to survive? 
Portland is south of Seattle.  Seattle and Portland are fierce rivals at everything. are you catching on yet?
BB guns would have no significant impact on a decent-sized airship unless the whole damn town was shooting at it all at once. For that matter, many real firearms would have only slightly more effect-- except for possibly scaring or injuring anyone onboard. Of course, if the airship pilot purposely brought it down low enough (and loitered in the best targeting spot for a long time) to help them, shotgun owners could probably begin causing it a lift problem after a while.   -- [One airship adventurer from decades past](http://www.jmooneyham.com/poor-mans-airship.html)
I am sorry for your experience, though I'm not quite sure how it ended as I couldn't finish reading it.
HAPPY BIRTHDAY JBoy!
Actually avoiding work, not my daughter but the whistle just blew so I'm outta here!
big demand for fertilizer pushed up the cost of shit
[Save yourself 30 seconds.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ri5-uR8-3AE#t=0m31s)
Wow, that drop is ... WAUW!  Is that Butch from Pulp Fiction?
Wow! It's like being skull-fucked by stupid.
If a dog sweats through its tongue, maybe this feels wonderful for dogs to do, especially on a hot summer day.
It's been a pleasure talking to you.
It's also interesting how new this is, with most of the designs dating to the last 10 years or so.  What could have prompted this?
Wait, wait, your book that is god's word contains an entire section that you *somehow just know* was caused by hallucinogenic mushrooms (I agree BTW) and you don't have a problem with that? That doesn't perhaps shine an unfavourable light on the rest of the ridiculous things in the other parts of the book? How do you get to pick and choose which bits to follow? How do you get to say which bits are bullshit and which bits are not? (I honestly can't tell the difference, the whole thing looks like a badly written garbled fairy tale).  Oh, and was Matthew on mushrooms too when he wrote [chapter 10](http://www.biblegateway.com/passage/?search=Matthew%2010:34-35&amp;version=NIV)?  Matthew 10:34-35 (New International Version)   34"Do not suppose that I have come to bring peace to the earth. I did not come to bring peace, but a sword. 35 For I have come to turn a man against his father, a daughter against her mother, a daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law -  That doesn't sound very nice to me.
It's not metric, I can tell you that.
Join us on the [industrial subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/r/industrialmusic).  Here's [Front Line Assembly with Epitaph](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uhMuGEzp3BA), another great industrial band with a former Skinny Puppy member.
I'll reiterate what everyone else is saying.  Do it.   I studied in Chile for 5 months then traveled South America for 4.  The women are beautiful and different.  The people you meet along the way will become close friends quickly, as only traveling can do.  I feel more alive in another culture than at any other time.  My Spanish ability is one of the main reasons I have the job I do now.   I dated a Chilean, spent time with her family and tremendously improved my Spanish.  I've never cried as hard as I did when I knew I had to take the 17 hour flight home.  I don't say that as a sad thing, but to illustrate how poignant and amazing experience it all was.    
Sounds like my marriage.
Am I the only one who doesn't feel the need to put a period at the end of a one sentence comment (because nothing follows that sentence so there is no point to show the end of the statement)?
I always wonder if people who do insane contortion have excruciatingly painful joint problems when they get old.
Scum to the south awwweee   Well good luck with that.  PTFC! 
..read in the voice of Yoda.
Clarence Boddicker
 That's pretty bad, it's suppose to be the opposite. U mooch.
Please post your reddit quote file somewhere!
And women that enjoy sex. Hence, slut for women and perv for men -- both point to scary non-standard sexual interests.
My-Sequel will be understood but it is rather archaic now.  The ANSI pronunciation of SQL is "ess cue ell" so I'd go with My-S-Q-L.  PostgreSQL is usually pronounced "post-gres-q-l" or just "post-gres".
Scott Joplin also harangued people for making their own DIY Pianola cards.  Damn kids and their backs of cereal packets... 
This is some of the best, and most accurate, fighting advice I have seen on reddit.
My issue is with pescatarians who call themselves vegetarians. It's because of them that when I say I'm vegetarian I sometimes end up with a fish sandwich.
I'm not sure if I'll get upvoted for making the exact same comment as the person I replied to but I'm not sure why you're getting upvoted for making the exact same joke as the person you replied to
Sarevok.  I FEAR NOTHING.
Not sure how well-known these guys are, but their first album is amazing, and is a good introduction to the genre for the uninitiated.  Both my mother and girlfriend enjoyed it on first hearing.  Note: There's a bit of naming confusion: the band's full name is "up-c down-c left-c right-c abc + start", they go by "upcdownc", and are often referred to as "up-c down-c".
Ooh, me next, me next!
Are you guys retarded?  The announcement is at 5:30, it's 5 right now.  I can assure you, DK isn't announcing time travel.  Wait 30 more minutes at least, probably more like an hour.
One of the main reasons their ratings sucked is that their time slot was carelessly juggled multiple times.
This seems like the same kind of choice that children who work in sweatshops have.
[How about this](http://allrecipes.com//Recipes/bbq--grilling/burgers/Top.aspx)
research the closest store to you that sells Fox farms Ocean forest, and go there
I never did understand how Russian casinos stay in business.
Wish I could vote thrice
Surely you jest, good sir.
Should We Encourage All-White Schools????..... O wait I think we've already been over this.
Whatever. I love my iPad. Yea, Apple is pricey, but I haven't regretted it a day. Show me a viable alternative at reasonable price.   Good graffiti though. 
It's a great film man.  If you like sci-fi I'm sure you'll love it
The phrase "cool off" doesn't exist for nothing.
Missouri City Area...  *god I hope you are not a serial killer*
What on earth is that wharrgarbl at the end about Obama?
Why is this? Is it just because you don't feel like doing math at the end of a meal?  As a waiter, myself, I know that I try harder at my job so that I can make bigger tips. I'm also much "happier" at my job in front of customers and I also recommend dishes that go together or drinks that go well with certain dishes.   If I were working for salary, you would be getting your food as fast as my manager made me and I *might* be happy to see you, depending on the day.
There's a The Clap for that?
a duck!
I think the concepts are useful, and should be heeded. I think "consent" is a pretty good rule of thumb for defining the line between good and bad. I just don't think they exist in the same sense as this laptop exists.
You didn't capitalize "W" or put a period at the end of your sentence.
How much was your order? I'm a Chinese food delivery guy and I have never dared asked a customer for a better tip, but I might if it was a very large order and I got about a buck, but I would have to work up a lot of nerve to do that.  Usually if I get stiffed I will tell my boss about it and we will write down the address and put an extra dollar on the delivery charge next time they order delivery.  But if you ordered about $50 dollars worth of food and gave the guy a $2 tip I wouldn't blame him for asking for a little more.
It's a slippery slope. All we can do is define words with more words.   What are electrons?   A subatomic particle.  What is a subatomic particle?  Small particles composing nucleons and atoms.  What is a nucleon?   A collective name for two baryons: the neutron and the proton  What is a baryon?  Baryons are the family of composite particles made of three quarks.  What are quarks?  An elementary particle.  All any definition does is describe what something is in relation to other things, it cannot, at least within our linguistic world, offer us any fundamental meaning on what something *really is* in and of itself.  This text is written terribly, and glosses over many important points - that should go without saying - but if it is written for children, it's hard to say much about it is really *wrong*, other than the scripture quotation at the bottom.
Using MetaReddit's "Over18" section and suggestions from violentacrez as a guide, I compiled a handy list of all the porn-oriented sub-reddits:   http://www.reddit.com/r/gonewild+nsfw+NSFW_nospam+Boobies+LegalTeens+Amateur+pornography+ass+jailbait+nsfw2+RealGirls+pornvids+Xsmall+nsfwvideos+milf+Celebs+voluptuous+Amateur_girls+The_nude+ginger+redheads+AnythingGoesNSFW+GirlswithGlasses+Teen_tits+Blowjobs+hardbodies+girlskissing+BDSMcommunity+WomenOfColor+Bondage+lusciousladies+thick+beach+collegesluts+Nipples+lesbians+AdultCorner+BDSM_NoSpam+Pinups+NSFW_Wallpapers+hugeboobs+BABES4PORN+Ultimate_NSFW+xxx+collegensfw+penis+fetish+nsfw_video+shemale+nsfwvids+Smokin+PunkGirls+bdsm+ClassicPornMags+sexyandshocking+nsfwnonporn+Waif+fuckbuddies+nudistbeach+Orgasms+girlsflashing+JailBaitPorn+selfpix+teens+showusyourtits+AnimatedGif+AsianHotties+streamingporn+NSFW3+kinky+AmateurPorn+Hardcore+Upskirt+vagina+badassgirls+grool+hentai+stockings+gonewildstories+porn4free+vintageporn+HairyPussy+pregnant+latinascaliente+specialrequests+AsianNSFW+adult_stream+hotmanflesh+PunkLovers+bustybabes+stfubitch+SceneGirls+Cuckold+nsfwnsfwnsfw+NSFWH+Hotchickswithtattoos+legs+ShinyPorn+Models+nsfa+AnalPorn+BBW_NSFW+assimg+seemore+futanari+EroticArt+NeedMorePorn+gaynsfw+corsets+teenxxx+Gay_Ultimate_NSFW+Spanking+asshole+PORNSTREAMING+arose+heels+pussy+hentaiseiyoku+Bukkake+cumshots+barelylegalteens+manlove+ittybitty+BuxomBabes+pornstuff+japaneseteens+snm+teenporno+rape+gape+freeporn+Sleepinggirl+nsfaus+anal_sex+oliviawilde+violentacrez+scissoring+IndianBabes+barebacksex+PrettyHotAndSexy+feetish+Manlaw+HIPSTERGURLZ+sex+Exhibitionist+ass_and_titties+bitches+bad_ass_girlfriends+emmawatson+voyeurs+sexy_facebook_girls+booty+racequeens+fapfapfap+bottomless_vixens+jailbait_nospam+shaylaren+igawyrwal+no_pants_party+christinahendricks+gothsluts+fellatio+openholes+fisting+pornstars+gilf+mandingo+flexi+webcam+bridesluts+vintageerotica+midgetsmut+hotamputees+namethatporn+sexybutnotporn+panties+brickhouse+tanlines+frenchmaid+transformation+highheels+pigtails+caribbeangirls+asianbabes+totallynsfw+eroticmayonnaise+sappho+latinaporn+pussypics+frecklefans+sexyflexi+eroticcontortion+cumtrays+shorthairedhotties+cumfetish+bikinibridge+bdsmgw+nsfw_hd+facialfun+bdsmmovies+fba+ang+nsfwpanel+treesgonewild+pregnantjb+dailyxxx+pfa+dirtysmall  Please let me know if I've missed any important ones and I'll edit/update this for future fapping efficiency.  EDIT: added "no_pants_party"    EDIT: added "christinahendricks"   EDIT: added "gothsluts"   EDIT: added "fellatio"   EDIT: added "openholes"  (stay classy, Reddit! ;)   EDIT: added "fisting" (jesus...how did I forget THAT? )   EDIT: added "pornstars"   EDIT: added "gilf"   EDIT: added "mandingo"   EDIT: added "flexi"   EDIT: added "webcam"   EDIT: added "bridesluts"   EDIT: added "vintageerotica"   EDIT: added "midgetsmut"   EDIT: added "hotamputees" (redundant?)   EDIT: added "namethatporn" (in 3 moans or less?)   EDIT: added "sexybutnotporn"   EDIT: added "panties"   EDIT: added "brickhouse"   EDIT: added "tanlines"   EDIT: added "frenchmaid"   EDIT: added "transformation" (more than meets the eye)   EDIT: added "highheels"   EDIT: added "pigtails"   EDIT: added "caribbeangirls"   EDIT: added "asianbabes"   EDIT: REMOVED "proteenmodels"   EDIT: REMOVED/BANNED "night_dolls"    EDIT: added "totallynsfw"   EDIT: added "eroticmayonnaise"   EDIT: added "sappho"   EDIT: added "latinaporn"   EDIT: added "pussypics"   EDIT: added "frecklefans"   EDIT: added "eroticcontortion"   EDIT: added "sexyflexi"   EDIT: added "cumtrays"   EDIT: added "shorthairedhotties"   EDIT: added "cumfetish"   EDIT: added "bikinibridge"   EDIT: added "bdsmgw"   EDIT: added "nsfw_hd"   EDIT: added "facialfun"   EDIT: REMOVED "perfection"   EDIT: REMOVED "porn_links"   EDIT: REMOVED "sexyyoungbabes"   EDIT: added "bdsmmovies"   EDIT: added "fba"   EDIT: added "ang"   EDIT: added "nsfwpanel"   EDIT: added "treesgonewild"   EDIT: added "pregnantjb"   EDIT: added "dailyxxx"   EDIT: added "pfa"   EDIT: added "dirtysmall"   REMOVED: girlsgonewild   REMOVED: fap   REMOVED: Adult
Do you like Dead Prez?
I'm fucking awsome!
The people I share with generally don't have the cashflow to buy the games, they need the money for more important things. From another response:  &gt; I buy a lot of games, probably the most prolific purchaser out of my gaming friends and family. I noticed over time that I would mention games that I really enjoyed and wanted to talk about and few of my friends had played them. The ones that hadn't generally said they couldn't buy games at the rate I did and thus tended to buy mostly multiplayer games that had more longevity for the cost.  I don't buy boxed anymore for several reasons. I love Steam and would rather spend my money there instead of at a retail outlet or even a retail website. Digital download/install is much more convenient for me and for sharing, especially with my brother who is out of state. I buy a lot of indie games, most of which are not available boxed.
Lover's Package. 
I want to give it it's 200th vote.
What do you mean, WoW requires a constant, active internet connection? RAAAAAAAAAAAAEGE
They changed her costume [in the 70s](http://dc.wikia.com/wiki/File:Wonder-Woman_1970s.jpg). I think even the National Organization for Women didn't mind or complain.
Cup-o-Kum.
Thanks to your username, I read this in an atrocious Russian accent. It was brilliant.
I once saw [Carl Herold](http://highercomputingforeveryone.com) walk on water to heal a wounded swan.  He is Love.
Can someone (who played both) tell me whether you preferred **The Witcher** or **Dragon Age Origins**?   I want to play a good current gen fantasy RPG.
Pools of Radiance, TSR.  Thank you.
thanks
how about Bone Sauce
I try not to overthink this. I'm not a bad guy, I just don't give a fuck. But I don't act like I don't give a fuck. I act like everything is right with the world. :D
I actually know someone who's had that. But she didn't figure it out until someone else told her. 
One must admit, whatever people think about the ultimate truth about pot, people who support it are better evangelists for it than any christian
I tried to read through this thread before asking this question, and I didn't see it.  I'm afraid I didn't read through the blog, but if you answer it on there, please link me to it so you don't have to re-write the answer.  Do you know what her backstory is?  Or anything about her family, where she came from?  I don't know much about China or the regions, but I would be interested to know what part of China (A name, or whether it's rural/urban), that sort of thing.
I misread this as "I Sketched Totoro", and was very confused for a moment.
Does atheism accept or reject religions that have gods?
john Mayer is touring with Keith Urban? Yeah I think I'm done here. 
But... cooldowns don't work that way... It's a 3 day cast time.
When I was BBSing, (JHS to HS), I was what you'd call a "leech" of what someone like you would consider the most insidious type. Now of course there were ratio boards that required you to upload in order to download, but I figured the following out: Back then most games were perhaps 7 or 8 disks, as in 3.5 inch floppies - this was before the CDRom explosion, and even during it as "stripped" releases - no sound, etc. to shrink the size were popular. What I'd do was upload 1.44 megs of crap (the game Cool Spot with the character from 7-up was frequently used because it was the perfect size) which would give me exactly 1 disk's worth of credit. I would then download a game 1 disk at a time (at 14.4), aborting it at the last second with 1K left to download. I would then PKZIPFIX all of the disks because I knew the last few bytes of the file would always be FILE_IDs or NFOs or some such. The BBS would give me the credit back, as it was an aborted download, and I'd just do it again and again. I thought I was the coolest hax0r in the world for figuring this out, but I've always wondered if I was the only one to come up with this idea. Any thoughts?
These sound like good suggestions.
There's a shortage of truly skilled and passionate hackers.  Get good, then write your own ticket, regardless of your age.  [Evidence](http://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=1474723), [more evidence](http://www.rethinkdb.com/blog/2010/06/will-the-real-programmers-please-stand-up/).  And your accounting degree/work isn't a waste either, as Fusion explains.  Verticle experience in other industries is always valuable in a Software Engineering/CS career.
That was immensely disgusting and not at all funny.
Tastes a lot like pork.
If they freed me from this prison, if that railroad train was mine, then I'd move it on a little further down the line....  Btw... as a non-American, could someone clarify one point for me:  “I kept thinking this was the kind of train that runs around a Christmas tree.”  ???  WFT?
The Nook (and I believe most other e-readers, and other devices like iPhones) have special "airplane modes" which actually turn off all of the transmitters and radios inside the device.   Unfortunately, airlines, at least in my experience, don't acknowledge this feature and will still ask you to turn the device off completely (even after explaining the feature to them) :(
I did keep it but lost it somewhere during the last days of school. But seriously, how did you guess?? Someone might actually discover my identity trolling through my history..
Uses up CPU, takes longer to decompress, takes longer to compress, means you cannot play the files with VLC (for a movie or something).
Your comment is far too intelligent and well-reasoned.  You will be down-voted into non-existence.
I couldn't pronounce Ashwaubenon for the longest time.  (Ashwaubenon, WI)
Adam's Apple has a bite missing. 
my appologies 
I have the Zelda Reorchestrated version of WW music on my ipod. it's able to evoke emotions from me that almost nothing else on there can. Windfall or Outset Island? Instant happy. Literally had the boss fight music get me off reddit and back to work hacking on some code. Unfortunately nothing close to a victory tune played when I fixed the nasty bug I was trying to avoid.
You didn't go temporaraly blind because of sniffing glue GlueBoy?
Workers do NOT have the power to refuse service for shitty tipping - that's the point. You are saying it's cool to needlessly punish people in the service industry simply because it is technically within your power to do so. Working service is degrading, demeaning and utterly powerless, and there are always fuckers that like to abuse you just because they can, and if the worker puts up a stink, the management has no problem firing you from your job that barely paid. I don't see the point in withholding a gratuity from powerless workers. Good tipping will get you anything you want - tip really, really well the first time and your server / hairdresser / bartender / delivery guy will ALWAYS remember you,bump other clients for you, put your ticket in first, give you free shit, etc. Why would you not start a positive relationship? I don't get it.
I have no idea where I'd track down the cane...
I think most people are very poor at creating a consistent, inner model to work off of. Instead they are hyper sensitive to external stimuli. Taken to a limit it's what creates feeling, and mysticism, things that are cherished if not celebrated in this society.
Elaborate... Please?
A bunch of stupid assholes gave me McDoubles to try and be nice.   Fuck you guys. I know that menu. I know damn well what I'm asking for when I say Double Cheeseburger. You will give me my second slice.   Once, I asked for Double Cheeseburgers and saw it come up on the teleprompter thing as McDoubles. I told them "Oh, I'm sorry, I must have misspoke, I wanted the Double Cheeseburgers for 1.29, not the McDoubles."   They apologized for their mistake, corrected it on the ticket, charged me the extra money, and proceeded to give me McDoubles.   You Fuckers.
I think your brother makes a very good point.
Wrong.  "The biggest unofficial additional subsidy comes in the form of US loans to Israel subsequently forgiven by an act of Congress. That is, every year Congressmen engage in an ingratiation-frenzy to show that they are "friends of Israel," and this often entails forgiving loans. It is difficult to determine the sums involved, but this practice explains why Israel is overjoyed to obtain loans--these will eventually be forgiven in any case." http://www.counterpunch.org/rooij1116.html  "more than $60 billion that has flowed from the United States to Israel since 1949 in outright grants, forgiven loans, and loan guarantees" http://www.washington-report.org/backissues/0296/9602046.html
Yep, he wouldn't have even got a ticket they say. The guy he hit was a crack addict that had been out of prison for maybe three days. So high he didn't even notice he was riding out into heavy traffic. 
Is he really that bad a motorcycle rider? Sheesh, ruined a whole sequence because he fell of his bike? Tell him to "man up". hehe.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=IBRL7D0wcXM  Obligatory to your second point.
&gt;The onus is on you.  You are the one making a claim dumbass. You really aren't that smart are you?  &gt;That's evidence right there. Do you not understand that ignorant racism is still racism?  I understand racism just fine, and now I understand that you don't. You *really* aren't that smart are you?  &gt;Islam forbids arranged marriages. But don't let the facts get in your way.  Care to show me where I said otherwise? Oh, what'st that? You can't because I never said that? Well then STFU.  &gt;You're the one that brought up the oppression of women, trying to argue that it's wrong. I never said otherwise, so nice strawman.  No you incredibly ignorant fuck. The video that this very comment thread is based on is about a WOMAN who was being OPPRESSED. Hence my comment about watching the video. You *really, really* aren't that bright are you?  &gt;You obviously meant to say something nonsensical, blah blah blah I am an ignorant fucktard.  Eat shit and die you fuckhead fairy princess.  &gt;Judging from what you've said early,  Did you mean to say *earlier*? Oh you made a grammatical error, by your very own "Logic" that renders your point invalid. You obviously meant to say something nonsensical since that's what typically comes from you. It's not my fault you can't write in proper English. No wonder you have so much difficulty in understanding me. You don't even have a basic grasp of English. Is English your second or third language? There is no way a native speaker can be this stupid  &gt;Me do the work!   Yes troll, YOU do the work. I am not about to waste one second trying to prove your idiotic theories. You can't provide a link because you are full of shit.  &gt;You're the one arguing. Wow, you're so stupid. You can't even keep track of your own arguments.  Try to follow along here dumb fuck. I know its really hard, but if you strain your pea brain *really* hard you might catch on.  **My Point**  I don't know who Walid Shoebat is but saying that someone  makes money from publishing their story does not in any way  make it false ( or true).  **Your stupid retort** (which is completely beside the point)  He lied about his story. The Israeli bank he claims to have bombed  has no record of any attacks against it.  **My reply**  That does not detract from my point. Again, saying that someone  makes money from publishing their story does not in any way  make it false ( or true).  **You even stupider retort:**  WOW! You're such a fucking braniac for figuring that out. Did you  ask your mommy for help on that one?  **My reply**  If you agree with it, why the hell are you arguing with me about it,  asshole.  **Your hilariously ironic fuck-witted retort**  You're the one arguing. Wow, you're so stupid. You can't even  keep track of your own arguments.  Yeah, I am the stupid one who can't keep track of their arguments. You could have simply agreed with my original statement, but that would be against the troll code of honor wouldn't it?  Did your priest accidentally rape in in the brain instead of the asshole? Allah will kick your stupid ass out of paradise for being such a fucktard. There goes your virgins and little boys to eternally rape.
I thought imgur was a genetic photo creation algorithm. It spits out random pixels, and determines which set of pixels humans like more based on upvotes, and makes mroe of those.
I know from painful personal experience that even the most faithful are susceptible to aggressive forms of cancer. So, anybody who says this is some sort of divine punishment will only get a hearty, "go fuck yourself" from me.
My point is that his whole argument was centered over some feel-good concept he has over pirating music as opposed to other forms of (possibly digital) copyrighted material.  Copyrights and patents seem so silly at first, but once you've created something of value, you start to think about things a bit differently (at least, I did). The current system honestly sucks, but until there's a better way to reward creators based on their contributions to society, it's the only one we have. If you like what you read/hear/taste/use/etc., pay for it!
He exercised his right to have a say in the matter and it was acknowledged, which was why the wedding was scaled down. His fiancé also has the right to have the kind of wedding she would like, but if they only went with what the groom wanted, only he would be happy. By just making the wedding smaller, the groom is happy because he will be more comfortable and the bride will be happy that there's still a fancy ceremony happening. Compromise!   He's willing to be a little uncomfortable for the sake of making his wife happy on the day he hopes she'll remember forever and there's nothing wrong with that. I'm sure she realizes what he's doing for her and will be more than happy to do something just for him later that night. :)
The fuck is quackwatch and why should I trust them?
I'm feeling for some reddit masochism today so here it is:   Iraq today is a lot better off without Saddam than with him. Overall what Bush &amp; Blair did in Iraq has had positive effects on peace, prosperity and freedom in Iraq.
Red Bean Popsicle in China. Hot day out, stop at ice cream stand, thought there were pictures of berries on the packaging.  Red beans taste like crap.  
Yes, it's in 7/8. It's been stuck in my head since The Eleventh Hour
Fuck you. That's all I have to say, fuck you.
Not new or an original choice but, for a road trip, 'Toxicity' by System Of A Down is a top sing-along, frenetic album!  For chilled listening whilst driving I recommend, "Nothing Changes Under The Sun" by Blue States.  It really is fantastic.
Now ask yourself: Is it in Apple's best interest to ensure you don't drop your iPhone?
A good cook.
Are the UK going to give George Bush a peace medal?  Fair is fair.
I know a lot of people that give presents around the holidays to their mail person. I'm considering starting that, because I do get a lot of mail. I'd much rather my mailman think highly of me than some random pizza/chinese delivery guy. (if I had a regular mechanic, I'd probably do the same)
In Alaska it might, down here it's full of parties, sun shine, and good times. I'd say steal your mom's purse and take a bus outta dodge. By the time you get back, your parents will just be happy that you're alive they'll forget you ditched them for a month.   *disclaimer: don't do that. If you do, don't blame it on me. Actually... your parents don't know me. Blame it on me!
A screaming Viking. 
I put a little [MOTHERFUCKING HIGH RES ON THAT SHIT!](http://i.imgur.com/0aZdK.png) for you.
You can check out all their stuff at http://larkthebeard.com . There's also a wingmen website redesign in the works.
Only LOL if you can LOL responsibly.
Your dad must look at some soft porn. If I ever had a daughter, decided to use her computer for porn and didn't have the skills to delete my browsing history.. Needless to say, having seen fisting midgets in the browsing history (Probably the softest of what she'd find) I don't see how we could look each other in the eye ever again.
Yeah, it's probably easier for you to piss on a sitting MP or cabinet minister than us guys.
The Kindle itself, no.  There's just something I don't like about using electronic things for things that don't need them.  Buttons to turn pages seem odd and I'm getting sick of having so many things that need to be charged.  Mostly I just really like actual books.
We people who live in Western countries take far too much for granted regarding the psychology of the broken and oppressed. Just because these people are not screaming at the top of their lungs about the rapes does not mean that they accept it as a part of their lives. A slave never "accepts" their state of enslavement as "a part of their lives." It is something that "must be endured" or "the situation that they are in at this point in their lives," but it is never a part of their lives.  It is not part of their culture and it's disingenuous of you to state it as an "accepted part of their lives." Congo is in the midst of a holocaust due to the actions of the individual men who are in control of their country and terrorizing the regular citizenry.   Rape is not part of the culture of the average citizen of this country and they do not "accept it as part of their lives." The regular husbands and fathers in Congo are not the ones going around raping the women. The husbands and fathers who live/lived in Darfur, Rwanda, Sierra Leone, Somalia, and the other African countries who are or were in the midst of being controlled or ruled by these military dictatorships/rebellions consisting of these "crazy men" do not accept rape as a part of their lives. The regular men are either tortured and forced to watch their women being raped or are outright killed either for refusing to participate or just to add to the rape victim's horror during the rape. The boys from these environments are taken from their families and homes, subjected to physical and psychological abuse/torture (not limited to homosexual rape, alcohol, drugs- my "favorite" is "brown-brown" a mixture of gunpowder and coke), and are eventually forced to become monsters like the men who abducted them.   And as for the women and girls; we already know what they go through. God help them because they are the ones left to endure (if they survive) the damned thing with having their lives ruined by the hell they personally endured and by the additional  horror of having their loved ones taken from them (either by death or abduction). And there are many cases where both the men and women who are subjected to this end up committing suicide.  Now, if you want to call these militarized camps/organizations of violent men who subscribe to this behavior a "culture," then go ahead. While I mildly disagree with you as it being a culture, I can't disagree with it being systematic. History has always shown that there are evil people who will use whatever tools are at hand to terrorize those who they feel are beneath them. And as we all know, rape is one of the easiest of those tools to employ. On that scale and in that context, rape hurts the entire community/family that is subjected to its horrors.   But to say that this atrocity is part of their culture and part of their way of life is an insult to the people of Congo. It will forever be a part of their history (albeit one that they would probably give anything to forget), but it can never be a part of their culture.
Because of this I carry with me a cardboard box and a pack of smokes everywhere I go. (Smoking helps me see otherwise invisible things, Mr. Snake has taught me!)
Who needs child prostitutes when you have elementary schools?  And anyway, they should be paying _me_.
Not my thing and not what I think of when I think of shemale. I'm attracted to a feminine body, either a pussy or dick down there, as long as they look feminine. I don't find female body builders attractive either, once they get to a certain build.
While putting a smile on your face.
If we are being that specific then EVERYTHING is harmful if taken in large quantities or for long enough.   Marijuana is harmless in small doses as long as it is not abused. Especially when you compare it to alcohol or tobacco the harmful effects are so great that weed seems harmless in comparison. 
I like a good martini every now and then.  Hendrick's gin, dirty as hell.  It's one of those "Gotta be in the mood" sorts of things, but it's a nice break from my usual gin &amp; tonic every once in a while.  So the other day, I ordered one, and the gal I was with at the time told me to get an extra toothpick of olives so she could have a couple.  "No problem," says I; I explained that I've never eaten an olive, and she could have mine.  She couldn't understand how I like dirty martinis and yet have never actually eaten the included olives.  After teasing me about it for a while, I told her that I'd eat an olive if she'd give me her number.  Somehow, that worked, but then I actually had to eat the damn olive.   I was fairly confident that it wouldn't taste too bad; heck, I've been drinking dirty martinis every once in a while since I turned 21.  Fuck no.  I was not prepared for that at *all.*  Olives are fucking disgusting.  Just a bitter, salty, poorly-textured piece of awfulness.  It was like eating solidified sea water. Never again.  I learned that I might not like dirty martinis, but that I must just really love gin.
Figure out how your race reproduces. Are there two genders, more than two genders, or even any genders at all?  For timelines, I think it would make sense to have key wars and some important ancient cultures (I mean, we had Greece/Rome/Egypt to name just a few).
You could do it the olde fashioned way with a tip switch. You could even make a mechanical tip switch out of something like paper clip wire. It could be a dangling lever that closes the circuit when something moves past it in one direction, but not the other.  If you know that the door will always be moving from a fully closed position, things are more predictable and the design would be simple. If you need to respond to the onset of motion from any starting position, it might be a little more complex.  I like making fun [mechanical solutions](http://www.arthurganson.com/pages/Sculptures.html).
He should train him to bring a beer.
I've met both the Gallagher brothers. Noel was nice. Liam was a dick. Go figure. 
&gt; I believe that with the legalization of weed, the personal feel to it will disappear.  I'd disagree, and assert that you'll be able to be more open with growers/distributors and enjoy communal activities without fear of incarceration. You can always continue to buy on the potentially 'more personal' black market (as most will), but won't have to worry about arrest on the way home.   &gt;They'd find ways to mass produce the shit as cheap as possible, and would probably start using chemicals and who knows what just as with produce and whatnot.   There will be cheaper and less natural/organic products available, but don't let that blind you to the often ugly truth of the status quo. Also, keep in mind that a legal market will bring greater access to rare/gourmet varietals, whereas most smokers now don't have choice/information about what strains they smoke. Legalization will foster diversity, expanding both low- and high-quality markets. It's also worth noting that InBev brews awful beer, but that doesn't stop my friendly neighborhood brewer from turning out the best Imperial Bock on the planet. The presence of low-quality beer on the market does not preclude the availability of high-quality beer, and the same applies for cannabis.  &gt;They'd wipe out local dispensaries who, not only need their jobs, but truly believe and are passionate about what they are doing.   Dispensaries would have a LARGER market. They may have more competition within that market, but they've also got networks of growers/customers that new startups would lack. It's also worth noting that Kevin Reed, who wrote that message and owns The Green Cross in San Francisco, sits on a 'citizens advisory board' on cannabis-related issues in SF. These boards (all around CA), are advocating for counties to stop giving business licenses for new dispensaries. The first ones in the door are trying to shut it behind them, with a significant profit incentives. Not exactly pure motives, if you ask me.  &gt;I feel like it would just be another part of this country that would become all about money.  I fear you're romanticising the present market for cannabis. There's a reason that we see a lot of fast/fat indicas on the market at the expense of slow/spindly sativas, and it has more to do with profit margins than passionate love of the product. 
I don't think that's as unusual as you think. Anytime I feel a bit anxious or awkward I always change the song I'm listening to, even if it has nothing to do with the thought.
my bad, posted that while in the middle of debating with someone else, just read your comment in the wrong light i guess
Jesus must be so proud!!
Worcester is "wooster", the sauce is named after Worcestershire, the county that Worcester is in.  Like most British place names, and indeed customs, it is designed to be as confusing as possible to outsiders. This is to prevent future invasions of the UK, and to ensure that all locals can have a good laugh at the tourists down the pub.
Close enough!
Here is a link to the Zig Zag Cafe's cocktail list.  Murray, the bartender, is one of the most recognized bartenders in the US.  He is a student of the craft and passionate about what he does.  Similar to The Violet Hour post, this place is standing room only 99% of the time.  http://zigzagseattle.com/drink
If you ever need any proof that upvotes are an indicator of interest, not perceived quality, this is it.  People were upvoting this initially because they wanted free shit, and subsequently because they realised that that's exactly what they were getting. If your faith was even slightly damaged by the vote count, it should have been restored by the comments.  I've clawed my way through utterly shit fiction before, just for the hell of it - the first half of the first sentence of *The Da Vinci Code* already had me cringing involuntarily, but somehow I read the entire thing and laughed my ass off several times, albeit derisively.  In the spirit of the post, and in case you haven't already seen it, here's [the best review of the worst book ever](http://www.amazon.com/review/R1LPA5YOND6TGD/)
What would you say to Street Fighter 4 for Tales, straight-up?
MUD (Multi-User Dungeon) like [Imperian](http://www.imperian.com), It's old school MMORPG.
But if it's their camera, why is this posted on John Mayer's tumblr?
I used to have pet mice when I was a kid. When I was ten I convinced my niece (who is a few years younger than me, yeah, weird family) that chocolate was made out of their shit. At first she didn't believe me, but because I was so insistent she ended up saying that she knew it all along. I had convinced her to try it because it was delicious, you know fresh from the source, but then her dad came out and asked what she was doing.
I met the producer of this video a few years ago while he was working on the documentary about the Niger Delta. Horrifying what's going on there. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bq2TBOHWFRc Please help to spread it.
I could use a few people like you in my life. Carry on with it.
Since you develop software, I'm surprised no one has mentioned the theory of computability.  It is germane, intrinsicly interesting, and accessible without having to know much abstract math.  The reason "the way we can shrink loops in higher dimensional spheres is a  fundamentally intractable problem" as Drunken_Physicist says is that it can be reduced to the Halting Problem.  That is, there exists no algorithm that will always compute whether a Turing machine will halt. 
Finding and keeping a romantic partner that you're interested in and who is interested in you, physically, mentally, and emotionally, is a huge challenge. We all make mistakes walking that road.  If you think everyone who ever finds that you're not their perfect fit must be some shallow girl just out looking for someone to abuse her, however, I really **do** feel sorry for you.
Twice!
I never saw it while it was airing.  I only had the chance *after* it was cancelled.  I give my apologies for being unable to time travel and boost ratings to prevent cancellation.
Many thanks!  I tried Macro after loving Intro to Econ, but had to drop it because I had difficulty with the fast pace paired with my instructor's thick accent...
Epsom... and my ass.
Beer Evaluates Everyone's Reasonableness. 
We can stop here, I believe it. Now to convince a girl to play this with me...
Maybe this might help  [UnRoot Incredible tutorial](http://androidforums.com/all-things-root-incredible/99828-video-howto-unroot-incredible-downgrading.html)
hmm, wiki says:   &gt; Chief stands about seven feet (2.13 m) tall and weighs **1,000 pounds (450 kg) in armor;**[16] without it, he stands six feet, seven inches (2 m) tall and weighs 287 pounds (130 kg).
While the MBA is (rightfully)much maligned, a science guy that can do it is always a hot commodity. You're practically a fucking vampire that walks by day as far as any employers are concerned. Then go wherever you want and do whatever you want.
yeah, what is laxbro? (serious)
those punch lines on the box are amazing!
I have to admit I haven't seen that dodge before
jealous. so jealous.
It isn't free, they just put it on your bill.
It's not that I don't know how to pronounce it, but more that I just cannot get my mouth to pronounce it correctly, but: **peculiar**  I swear, if you can say that word slowly and correctly, you are a better person than I.
The only time this is nearly acceptable is if it's one of those "web 2.0 desktop application in your web browser LOL" type webpages where closing the tab might result in lots of unsaved work. However those are still annoying to all hell because they show up whether or not you might lose work, which makes them useless. The reason the "are you sure" popup is useful because it's actually reminding you to do something that you probably forgot to do (eg the document isnt saved) but if it comes up everytime it's just another habitual twitch you learn to have to automatically click yes.
Rule #59b of Reddit: Any submission discussing music with any qualities will include Radiohead, no matter what.
I don't think I'm a lazy programmer, I work pretty hard. Sure I might not re-implement databases and the os, but I get a lot more done in a week of coding nowadays then I would 10 years ago.
1st paragraph was mostly true although very mystical in tone. 2nd paragraph took a trip into imaginary fairy land.
&gt; the community of programmers-with-a-clue is a pretty small subset of the community of programmers in general What's worse is too many of the talented ones lack training. I've got a business user who has done things with VB and Access that would be impossible for most of the people I interviewed. I just want to say to them "Look. You've got 4 years of college and 6 years of experience. That guy over there learned how to program six months ago and can already do things you will never understand. Just give up and find a new career."
Hi John Mayer!
God damn that is a manly Speedo.
Too /= to.  Always have someone proof your cover letter and resume.
 Keep it warm. Find a box or pet carrier and put it in it,have a heating pad under one side of the box  and set the box on it.  Put a towel inside for the bird to rest on...Place a light colored towel over the top, so the bird can't see you. Bread crumbs won't cut it,it's better to offer some meal worms,or a bit of canned dog food and perhaps a few chopped up grapes.  Don't leave the dog food in more than a few hours without offering fresh food.out offering fresh.  Get it to the Vet  or a wildlife shelter.asap
So, let's try a 4th Reich? 
Honestly, I don't care if it wins.  The bike could suck for all I care.  It would still be awesome, because it looks fucking cool.
Guess what? Interest rates demanded on 10-year T-bills are at their lowest level in years. Below 3%, actually. Lower than China's, which has a massive surplus. Meanwhile, inflation has decreased lately. The problem, for the moment, remains the threat of deflation. 
If paying the electricity bill with a 2nd person in the house is causing you financial stress, you might not really be in a position to pick up supporting another person.  Just lay out the facts for her and say "hey - this shit is costing me a lot of money &amp; money's tight.  Nothing personal but could please try to help keep it down".  If she refuses, let her know that she should start looking for somewhere else to stay - she's just demonstrated that she's a selfish little girl.
&gt; I'm very much impressed by how passionately you've stood your ground, and how articulate you've been in doing so, and I can't tell you how excited I am that you didn't misspell anything, not once in this entire exchange. **(Well, you wrote "you're" when you meant "your" once, but I'll let it go.)**  I KNEW IT! HE'S A REDDITOR!  edit: I take that back.. a redditor would NEVER let that go.
I'm so jealous, that cat has the life I wish I had.
yo dawg, i heard you like compliments. so, i complimented your compliment with compliments. 
ahh thanks, i can be a bit of an idiot when high.
Sounds like a good plan. I'll get the 5830, and not upgrade until a couple of series later. Thanks!
I find the sprints a heck of a lot easier to get into.
Yeah I don't care at all. Its even by Activision, who made Modern Warfare 1. Also the whole games style reminds me of MW1, Bioshock, and Batman Arkham Asylum mixed together. Batman for the environment style not the gameplay.
Sorry guys, that link looked like the right one. Just got home and checked.  The game I'm thinking of is [Storage Inc](http://marketplace.xbox.com/en-US/games/media/66acd000-77fe-1000-9115-d802585502c6/).
pretty much nailed it.
but why would they need antenna engineers if there is no problem?
I'm not sure it's a good idea.  If the only way of getting into a relationship with someone is by playing games, then IMO that person is not worth getting into a relationship with.
Awesome! All of these are great bands. Thanks for the help :)
Thinking something like this: http://wordandimage.files.wordpress.com/2008/04/pctechsupportcat.jpg  But I suck at graphic design. 
Yes.  I stayed in Florence for 5 weeks it was beautiful/amazing/I became a italian speaking douche saying ciao for a month when I got home.  Advice: Don't bring your SO
Or you could at least have given this [link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MU_puzzle). :(
[Dance][Egg Dishes][Dance]  [[Galka][Meat][Rod][Inside][Taru][Fun][Hole]](http://wiki.ffxiclopedia.org/wiki/Auto-Translator)
solar
No good can come of this.
1/4g? easy there, killer.
delivery drivers need tips to pay for gas/ sometimes restaurants do no pay them minimum wage. that being said, in my days of delivery driving I would have never asked for a larger tip... just fumed about it in my car
I didn't touch it. The edit was for the link.
el dorado.
Sounds like micromanagement hell. I reserve that for 4X games ;)
Kevin Spacey in "A Bug's Life"
Big badda boom.
I had a lot of fun drawing all these different gods, even though the aren't real.
My boyfriend and I use the term "pervie-pie" as a pet name.  Just sayin'.
A shirt-off. The most splendid after bar ritual there is.
Uh, they created anti-lesbianism drug and we haven't cured AIDS and cancers. 
Tequila. Friends locked me out on the hotel balcony (18th floor). I climbed across to the neighboring room completely shitfaced.
I simply answered your question that stated  &gt;when is the last time you saw anything Microsoft makes advertised?  But I do agree, Microsoft needs to advertise a lot more of their products.  Nobody realizes that Microsoft is MUCH more bigger than Windows and Office.
wow.  Angry much?  I said something that is totally factual and added some insight to conversation.  I never said anything about Apple and the only thing I did do was agree with above post that said specifically *"if Apple deceived the public or their shareholders"* so RELAX
In many states, HOAs have more power to foreclose homes than county or state government. The gradual increase in power held by HOAs is something that I've watched for years and it thoroughly disgusts me. I have personally witnessed someone evicted from their home because they ran afoul of the wrong person in their housing division. In many cases (at least from my experience) an HOA operates not so much as a collaboration of neighbors maintaining public structures and general upkeep of their collective living areas, and much more as a form of ultra-local government--a government that operates with little if any oversight and often controlled by people who think nothing of using their power to settle personal disputes between them and their neighbors.
Sorry wrong - a lot of these soldiers care a lot - they are just young and mislead by one of the most powerful and well-funded propaganda machines ever conceived. That's why people here are saying "Fuck war" ... nobody wins.
Good thing people pay monthly to make sure dumb shit like this doesn't happen.
Thanks for the update. I provided my email address awhile ago to you via PM. Like I said, not only have I been through this, but I am a health care professional in the medication/psychology area and can be of use if you need someone to talk to.  I have to tell you that you're delaying your healing by having her there at all, even if you;'re not seeing her, you cannot move on until you have severed all connection with her in every way. You're in fact, putting yourself through more pain and suffering, under the guise of "being a nice, decent guy". I can't make you force her to move out immediately, but again, what you're doing is only benefiting her and harming yourself more.  Feel free to email me, I'd love to know how you're doing and I'd love to be of some help if I can. Take care.
Wow.  I find it **hilarious** that you think this is an "alphabet soup" and that tired-out garbage graffiti is "philosophical."  Clearly you have ZERO exposure to any *actual* philosophical ideas.  [This](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/To_a_Mouse) is an alphabet soup only because you're too stupid to understand it.  I'll come write "Kill the Tube!  Unplug the drug!" on your wall instead, since you clearly love cliche lines.
Hey I watched the peer reviewed bomb videos
Well my username IS bunnetron...
Much more than a groan, more akin to a miniature heartbreak.
Do you go to UCSB?  There is a Gayley walk in one of their student housing blocks.
 Those were only suggestions, and you'll figure out new things when you get addicted to exercise. At the risk of sounding patronizing when I'm being just the opposite: At age 19, you haven't done much yet, the world and your body have a lot more neat shit for you to experience! I am a formerly lazy geek, now a 33yo semi-lazy geek. :)  I quite literally did zero exercise from age 18 to age 27. Biggest, longest mistake of my life! The only reason that you haven't found joy in movement is because you haven't done enough of it! The human body evolved to MOVE! Ranging, foraging, hunting, fleeing. Watch a documentary on tribal lifestyle, they never stop! There is a happy middle-ground though, and I've found my part of it. Just took me a year or two of not giving up and trying different things. War walking is a **great** idea if it will get you moving and keep you happy. I actually started by just walking, moved into barefoot-style walking when my back hurt, and after 2 years, into sprint intervals/hard hill walking as I really started to love it. Started lifting in there somewhere, after a big masonry project that my dad and I did made me realize that all that muscle that I had gained made life more fun but didn't turn me into a muscle-head. Exercise only sucked at first, now i'm an addict! Speaking of war walking and other geekified exercise, my cousin the uber-geek wanted to design a "geek gym" to get into shape and also torture his newly hired employees (he does high-end IT and telecom on a few college campuses). Attach a metal plate to a laptop to stabilize it and work the arms/back, and run from job site to job site, configuring stuff on the way, then wiring stuff in a low horse stance with a heavy backpack full of cable spools, move from job to job jumping over obstacles and by only touching the ground when you absolutely have to, basically doing every geek job the hardest but fastest way you can think of, lol. Then at nite... THE NINJA HACKING!!!
I suspect a lot of redditors are too young for this joke.  
Absolutely true. Zach's accent is awesomely good. 
This is reddit.  This is the internet's depository of everything wholly unnecessary.  
Here's my guess:  Miami gets rid of Beasley in exchange for some cap room. Then they grab Lebron and Bosh while holding onto Wade. They grab up some veterans who want to play for small salaries but win and create a dynasty that should last for 5 or 6 years.   Nowitzki stays at Dallas  Stoudemire goes to New York  Johnson goes to New York  Chicago gets Pierce and some medium salary players.
That's cool, did they change the music in the zones? How was the feel?
Oh. my. YES!
&gt;It's a comfort for *ME* to see an image of your loved one looking like they are sleeping peacefully. There I fixed that for you. I stand by my opinion that this is in fact creepy and agree with religionisanger that it almost seems to border on a denial. Making the stillborn a mamber of the family and getting such a picture taken to me seems counterproductive. Though hey if some people move on quicker having gone down this route who am I to say its inherently bad?
As a pastry chef, I encounter the word a lot.  Caramel is the burnt sugar sauce, Carmel is a town in NY.  It bugs me.
It was on some forum where I read that, I think. Interesting, to say the least.
I take it that you also were bitten by a radioactive skeptic years ago?  That's how my sense developed.
GOD, yes.. it's so frustrating... www.stumbleupon.com helps though; at least introduce some new shit into your rut.
Is there a way I can add a usual dvd version of bc2 to Steam? So I can talk to my mates on there.
Fuck you youngin. Reddit knows no ages. Now get off my lawn.
I read this in that voice before I even saw your comment.
No, but next time I have an empty roll this may happen.
The old version of Empire Deluxe did that too.
Amazon's acquisition strategy seems to be "Here's a bunch of money. Carry on." so I'm not too worried.
lol no
At least Frei didn't lie and admitted to doping when he was caught.  At least, that was my recollection.  Still...I just wish there was a magic bullet to clean up pro cycling. Naive, I know.
I hate it when my balls fall out.
You wouldn't believe what a pain in the ass it is to get "atheist" on your dog tags.
I was confused too. Christian Science is a cult. But this seems to be a science textbook which is Christian.
Wow, I think I saw that when it came out on dvd with the kids. I vaguely remember that plot... if I am lucky it may be lying around the house somewhere. Good call!
No, it just means that I don't take lungs full of smoke so heavy that my body convulses from the shock. Anyway, you can't get NEARLY as high from smoking cannabis as you can from consuming edibles.  I had a HEAVY dose of cannamilk once (the guy didn't warn me about the size of the dose) and while I was tripping I was describing my experience to which others present were commenting, "Damn, that sounds like a straight LSD trip!" which after an hour turned into, "Damn!  That sounds like a straight DMT trip!"  It was without doubt a life changing experience that gave me newfound respect for Mother Ganja.  If that was a [10], the absolute highest I've ever been from smoking is a [4] and in my day-to-day all I'm looking to reach is a [2.5]-[3].  After the first HOUR I was higher than I'd ever been and it just kept coming on and coming on and coming on over the next three hours...
Fear of death is rational, I do not want to die, but I am not so fearful of it that I feel I must make up a ficticious story of an afterlife, when there is not one shred of evidence anywhere that would logically lead me to think this. What is wrong with my post man? I tell you what, after we are all dead, and it will happen I assure you, you guys can all come and kick my eternal ass for being wrong, but while we are still in our mortal bodies, why don't all you afterlifers just STFU. You sound pretty intellectually lazy yourself pal. I won't even mention your grammatical laziness. 
Does anybody else think that one contributing factor might simply be a genetic one?  I know this is terribly racist and taboo thing to say.. but it seems at least plausible for me. Among the "races" of humans there are plenty of clear statistical differences in body size and shape that nobody questions.  Since the brain is part of the body, I don't see why it should be "imune" to similar statistical differences.  Now I'm sure that there multiple reasons for IQ-inequalities and genes might just play a small role, but it might be there.   And btw: No, I'm not one of those white supremacist guys who planned on infiltrating reddit.
This article is a third grader's wet dream.  (I still smirked at their last name.)
I could eat nothing but Cheez-its and still be a vegetarian.   God DAMN I love Cheezits.
Nevermore.
Herp Derpage?
Look, just some crazy girl who hasn't been laid in a while. I feel her pain.  Still wouldn't though.
&gt;&gt;the other half admit he's a complete douche.  I like how you place "admit" instead of "think" way to spin it it there, buddy.
They steal a lot of it from the occupied territories, too, at the expense of the Palestinians.
blown = penis
Here is the link to the meme entry:  http://knowyourmeme.com/memes/impossible-is-nothing
Oh... look what I just created:  http://www.reddit.com/r/upboatsanonymous/  [](//#trollface) problem?
[You are absolutely correct.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fCKDvjVzpNQ)  I love this game.
I want to hear a hawaiian death metal band using these
I thought this was going to be something similar to the [Niggar Family](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__z7dRCG2ag).
and no i am not a troll, i am someone who belongs to a family which suffered from alot domestic violence, due to Alcohol. So i personally know 5 victims of alcohol. Things would never be the same for these 5 people. I think unless you become the victim to something awful, you dont realize how bad it really is. 
The answer's a piece of cake.
I missed it as well, bought L4D today, but will definitely try L4D2 if the sale comes around again.  Time to see what all this zombie nonsense is about.
Guys also have the advantage of not being subtly told their whole lives that they need to cover/enhance their faces in order to be fit to go out in public.
Nobody here believes you've ever actually slept with a woman ever.
So i guess what you would be saying in opposing merely having the option, that you think *you* would be better qualified to make decisions for the baby over its actual parents on this matter.   Its a sticky subject I think though I support the discovery of such technology in the end. Even though parents should be wary of the long term effect of any treatment from flu shots to something like this, I think that parents should be able to "determine the morphology of their children" as enkiam put it. This treatment is no different in an ideological sense than determining the child's eye color or small doses of steroids during puberty if the child is not "blossoming"(the penis isn't growing balls aren't dropping no interest in sexuality, no mature physical growth for instance).  All of these things come from a parent's effort to shape their child into what they consider to be an ideal person that would be best equipped to have a happy life under any situation. While I agree it is always tricky when someone is making decisions for somebody else, it is baby. It cannot live on its own and so the parents have no choice but to make the best decisions for the child that they can until it can do it themselves. These decisions include breast feeding, circumcision whether or not to home school them, and yes even medical procedures. And like with any ordeal between parents and children, the child just have to wait until its all grown up to find out if the parents made a big mistake.  In the end it is a choice that a parent has to make just like all of the other ones i presented, and I hope that nobody, especially an Anarchist would be so gay and proud that that they would even consider opposing choice itself, especially for someone else. The baby gets no choice in this matter obviously, and wont have a choice in the matter when it is all grown up, whether or not it is gay or straight anyway. So were not talking about choice for the child but the choice of the parents.  "...restore this baby to the normal female appearance which would be compatible with her parents presenting her as a girl, with her eventually becoming somebody’s wife, and having normal sexual development, and becoming a mother."  This is a little bit of a fucked up way to communicate your expectations for the program though. Especially since gender roles are a bit intangible in the first place.  Understand that I don't really like it in particular. I wouldn't do that to my child if i ever have one. But, like circumcision of someone else's child, its really not my call. There's a difference between rescuing someone from harmful parents, and simply not liking how other parents are raising their kids. 
We all are, there are way more bacterial cells in your body than cells that are actually part of you.
The kitten will always love you.
Tuba.
that is the worst commentator i have ever heard.
They've left parts of it left *unpolluted*!
That would just detract from the details I worked hard on. You get the idea if they are in front anyway.  Call it artistic license.
I was secretly hoping this would be here.  Didn't expect to find it like this, haha.
I saw some interior art with the costume and it looks like one of those designs that only the guy who designed it can draw right. Kinda like when Joe Madureira redesigned Storm's costume.  So I'd say it's more like a mid nineties X-Men character.
[I did one a few months ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/bczhz/iama_freelance_videoaudio_engineer_who_has_worked/).  I guess I could do one again, but feel free to ask anything here if you like.
It's fairly easy to see that our world is being enhanced by the application of research. The real food for thought is the realization that this world will continue to get more and more fantastic. Also, the odds are in your favor that you will be able to experience it.
An app to make those depressing times where you get high and browse the internet alone in the dark more enjoyable? Apathy and laziness isn't a related to smoking pot, what?
look at his eyes, look at his motherfucking eyes!!!
I upvoted you, but I wonder what you make of slut-shaming suicides?
Even if you just feel it, your brain is doing all those calculations anyway. It's just automating. Shit man, the brain.
Haha this is the first song I had in mind. My husband isn't a Willie Nelson fan, but he'll have to deal with it for a while!
Some people might want it for a background I suppose. Eh.
Thanks a lot, man.
This. Sometimes the 4/6 pin is in a strange place, but I have had multiple builds where this is the problem.
Did ya know ants taste lemony b/c of some acid they have?
I love this track
Haha, so tuesday is not a weekday.  Your arguments get better and better.
That's some middle ages shit right there.
It sounds so easy in theory...
And the price went up 2% in a day.  That's a 1377% yearly return.  He should get a medal.  
I am a 22 yeah old man who is 5'6" and with a 22" waist. H&amp;M is the only store I know of that has clothes that will fit me. They are the best, woot-woot!
Without hesitation... DO IT! It's an opportunity that will be rare/very difficult to do when you're older and settled down. Travel and experience as much of the world as you can now while you're still young. Honestly, don't think twice.  I've had friends take out extra loans to study abroad, they're still paying them off and they don't regret a bit of it.   I studied abroad in Egypt in 2005 and I'm about to study abroad again in Jordan starting this September. Loved it beyond belief and I can't wait for this fall :-)
I can't answer this riddle for you. Until you figure it out on your own you will never understand how applications work in multi-process environments.
&gt;According to them, the phenomenon of socially punishing students who "act white"--i.e. focus on grades--is something that happens mostly in mixed-race schools, where black students are trying to maintain a distinct identity.  Or maybe we should work toward dispelling the belief that focusing on good grades is a 'white thing.'  Maybe we should work toward discouraging the idea that blowing off school and getting bad grades is a part of black culture. I'd be interested to know where the kids are getting this idea in the first place.  &gt;Buck does not mean that the notoriously lousy all-black inner-city schools should be our model for success. But in the increasing numbers of all-black charter schools...  Maybe we should investigate the difference between the two, if segregation is a common trait.
He has slid his body behind a prop. If you look at his back foot, you can actually see that it is still barefoot.
I've been playing for a few months, and still suck. I can never seem to get city specialization right. :(  I'm getting better at placing cities, but after founding them I end up building everything. 
&gt;Lower (or no) taxes for all people.  How does this work, exactly - the "no" option? Private police, roads, and firefighters?
Strangers and co-workers often tell me "You smell good." Even though it can be chalked up to proper hygienic skills, on my sweatiest and most insecure days, its a huge confidence booster.
Don't you understand that you're just being paranoid when you say that?
Just in case you missed it, this speech was given last week, not yesterday
Dude in case you didn't know this AloysiusSavant guy, yea hes crazy. Now don't get me wrong I love this dude and there is a good chance hes about to drive 5 hours so he can crash on my couch tonight. But the point I'm trying to make is you can be sure about this guy. You may think he'll like the movie but you never know when hes gonna go off the deep end and go all hulk on Manhattan. If you know what I mean. Which you apparently don't. Unless you do.
ADW Launcher helps a lot with that.
Keynesian.  Yeesh, you'd think people would be embarrassed to admit they still believe in that stuff by now.  Guess not.
I agree with that reasoning.  Even just playing soccer and basketball would do it.  If you fall during a game of basketball, you get your ass up and chase down who did it and rip the ball out of their hands.  There are only five people on your team and the court's smaller.  You don't have time to chill out and hope for a foul.  EDIT: Also, I don't know a single male athlete at my school who played soccer, but not basketball or football.  Which is why this makes sense to me.
Yes use your intelligent mind to help war mongers..good plan..what he said.
Glenn Beck.  Edit: On second thought, I'm pretty sure that's the only source he uses.
If the drive just doesn't operate enough to boot and then grab the info off of it, try following the directions below. Hopefully you'll get 20-30 minutes more out of the drive. If the home folder is not encrypted or secured by NTFS permissioning you might want to try hooking the drive up as a slave to a secondary computer. This way you can transfer data fast.  ------- 1. Put masking tape over the data and electrical connectors of the drive. 2. Immerse the drive in a ziplock bag of minute-rice, with the data/power connectors sticking up. This can't be regular rice, it MUST be minute rice. This acts as a poor man's silica gel later in the process (Tyler's note: certain kitty liter brands are silica based and are an effective substitute). Close the zip-lock. 3. Freeze the bag of rice with the hard drive in it in the deep freeze for 24 hours. You want it completely frozen, patience is a virtue. 4. Remove the bag from the freezer, and take it to a pre-prepared computer where the drive is ready to be received and plugged in (longer data cable, longer power cable, etc...) You should have another big data drive in the system ready to receive the data from the frozen drive. 5. Leave the drive immersed in the minute rice except for the data/power connector. Remove the tape. Plug in the data and power cables. Try to re-seal the zip-lock bag as much as possible so you don't have rice grains escaping. 6. Orient the drive so it's laying in as natural of a position as possible with as much frozen rice around it. 7. Fire up the system, and try to access the frozen drive. This is the moment of truth. If you're lucky, it'll identify and respond, and you'll have access to the file system.  8. You now about 20 reliable minutes to copy data. You may get more if you're lucky. Copy copy copy. Note: The drive WILL be slow at first, and will speed up as it starts to warm.  Why the minute rice? It performs two functions: First, it keeps the moisture from condensing on, and in the drive's metal parts. Moisture's the killer when you power up a frozen drive. Second, it provides an additional thermal block of "cool" to help keep the driveat a lower temperature while you perform the copy.  Source: http://hardware.slashdot.org/comments.pl?sid=550870&amp;cid=23386444
First day there go to the bar and ask for a Snakebite.  Carlsberg, Strongbow, 2 fingers of Ribena.  Try not to go get too drunk.
Wow. Um. Banana Hammock and Jean shorts in shot # 4... Seriously though, Hulk seems cool. I'd hang out with him (as long as he covers his bits up..)
... ing charges
$2M seems well beyond upper middle class to me, not that it matters. I was just curious if your family was in the upper levels of church financing, but I guess not.
nope.
&gt;I also find it slightly hypocritcal of you to have such a holier than thou outlook on this, when you yourself have tested marijuana and LSD on your body. Just because you don't like the effects it has on you: DOES NOT MEAN OTHERS DO NOT LIKE IT. Seriously, my rights as an American are tested every day while weed is still illegal. I don't trample your rights, or come down to where you work and slap the cock out of your mouth. So please don't do so to me.  I never did any of the sort.  I'm sorry if I come across as hypocritical or self righteous, but I was asking a question about peoples perceptions about drug use and it seems a large number of the answers I have received are, "You're fucking stupid, shut the fuck up."  I know I am not as educated about the issue, and all who have presented counter arguments with facts are most welcome.  Yet, telling me I'm fucking stupid and an authoritarian for feeling that there needs to be some regulation doesn't endear me to supporting "the cause" with any more than lip service.  The fact that some people have had negative effects from the use of the drug goes back to my point that it *can* be harmful.  At the same time at every point I said that, I framed it in the aspect of "relatively", and "no more so."  Yet, it seems that where I agreed with most people, and that I received a hell of a lot of rhetoric, personal attacks, and outright dismissals of what is a valid point...that it *can* be harmful.  People seem to miss the italics and emphasis there and go straight for the "Shut the fuck up you are out of your element and WRONG."  Those kind of counter arguments infuriate me since I am trying to understand with reason and understanding yet the feedback I get is aggressive and close minded to other perspectives.
Some people get all freaked out when their gelatin is made from horses, or baby goats.
That seems like a very bad deal for you.
Does any body else masturbate?
I picked this up in my teacher's room after my calc final and was spellbound.  Almost missed my next final.
Conspiracy theories are fun, aren't they? =)
No it does not.  It lists information.  The question decides what matters.
Competitors don't what?
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-gb0mxcpPOU  Nuff said.
I've always stood up when wiping. It's just easier and is a cleaner wipe when done.
Midnight is definitely my favorite non-Moffat episode, followed closely by Vincent and the Doctor.
I switch between Aqua Velva and Old Spice...have been doing so for the last 22﻿ years.  I'm obviously the fucking bomb.   It just took this commercial for me to realize it.  Now to tell the whole God damned world about me!
I used to work for ADV, and if that's the show I think it is (and pardon me, but in this case a lot of them do look alike), than its a life ruiner and thanks for reminding me.
Meh, market training requires some brainpower.  Not like accepting some missions, getting aggro, releasing drones, and coming back to money.  I'm not much of a missioner, it's too boring.  Also, learn new words errday!  proletariat - the class of wage earners, esp. those who earn their living by manual labor or who are dependent for support on daily or casual employment; the working class.
LOL  @ the "censored one"  We all its you Allah  - 0
"... and in the darkness of chaos, they fooled Crom, and they took from him the enigma of steel. Crom was angered, and the earth shook, and fire and wind struck down these giants, and they threw their bodies into the waters. But in their rage, the gods forgot the secret of steel and left it on the battlefield, and we who found it—are just men. Not gods, not giants. Just men."  s/steel/electicity
It sounds bad, but a million people is only 1 in 6,000.
I don't blame you, it was a 2.5L Stroker (evo-specs)... 
The **how** is already being debated.   I do have some speculation on **why** to offer.  If they have been using a hack into the account db to compromise accounts, why tip their hand with a sudden burst of activity?  I suspect they may be looking for accounts with cataclysm invites, perhaps?
You're lucky. A friend did the same thing, and burned their house down. They had to bulldoze it, and rebuild.
Admiral Tibbs speaks soothfully.
The A Team 2: The B Team
Ok, thank you for your concession.  It may strike you as semantics, but to me, it is a crucial point at the very heart of the matter. My second point is that copyright is, for the most part, wrong.  * When it was established (in the US) copyrights lasted for 14 years.  Now every time That Fucking Mouse is about to go out of copyright, a coven of lawyers descends on DC and gets another lifetime to it.  Is this reasonable?  Is this encouraging artists?  * In the article, a young woman wants to sing a song.  She wants to collaborate with other artists, put on a show, but she is forbidden by copyright law.  Is this how music has worked for the last 10,000 years?  Or do artists generally share, copy and imitate one another?  Has society been improved by this prohibition? * In the young woman's example, she suggests that she will sing the song for other people and increase the artist's exposure.  Is that valid?  I can say from personal experience that Internet copyright infringement is an outstanding way to introduce artists - especially smaller, more remote acts - to audiences that would otherwise never hear them.  I have stacks of tickets stubs, tshirts and whatnot from bands i would *never* had heard of, without an act of copyright infringement.  Copyright infringement puts money in artists pockets. * In the composers example, one should pay to get his "intellectual property."  This puts money in the music company's pocket, and tends to suppress the work of smaller, and more distant acts.  Is this really better for artists?  For society? I have to make dinner now.  
I found a keyboard/mouse combo that I really like **[here](http://www.newegg.com/Product/Product.aspx?Item=N82E16823166079&amp;cm_re=adesso-_-23-166-079-_-Product)**.  It's the next best thing to having a remote, IMO.
By stealing your friend's beer and *taunting* him with it?! Fucking dog.
If you hadn't, I would likely have added a comment much to that effect. I enjoy hoedowning next to my sentry almost as much as I enjoy sentry busting. 
Probably gonna get lost in all this clutter but:   23 GWM from RI going for my masters in Math
Well it might be...
dammit I knew it... son of a ..!
Not always, no. But the thing that gets me is how hard it is to tell female from male commentary, unless the topic is overtly sexual.
unless...he specializes in the holy spec and he has a reduced cast time/cooldown on Resurrection.
And ... you think a reddit posting asking them to set your user preferences for you, along with the claim that they've failed despite that they're actually growing fast, will?
The first four season of the newer Doctor Who (starting with Christopher Eccleston) are on netflix watch instantly if you have it. It doesn't appear the Christmas specials are on watch instantly, so you'd have to get it by disc or other means (you should really watch them, they are worth it). If you do get into it, be aware that there is basically a season 4.5. It consists of 4 "specials" with one being a two-parter. After that they transitioned to another Doctor (third for the reboot) and another head writer. Don't be afraid of the writer change, the guy wrote several of the best episodes in seasons 1 through 4 (The Empty Child, Blink, Silence in the Library/Forest of the Dead), and season 5 was awesome.  TL;DR: Don't blink. Blink and you're dead. Don't turn you back. Don't look away. And don't blink. Good luck."
Justin Wilson.
\_want\_bag\_of\_crap\_
[Good Woman](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_lJiwKskTlE&amp;feature=related) - Cat Power
She has diarrhea from Celiac and you say: "That's really crappy,"  That's really funny.
&gt; the feeling of being "in love" has disappeared (and it will)  What makes you think that all married couples lose that feeling?
For the record, it's not my bedroom, it is a room my boyfriend and I, who are extremely committed, share. 
Jason Robert Brown is an ok guy. I've never been told that he's super nice but I've never been told that he's an asshole, either. Haven't met him in person but a good deal of my friends have and know him.  Brown personally encouraged my friend to do "Songs for a New World" with a huge-ass cast. "Songs for a New World" is a musical with a very small cast. My friend came up to Brown one day and asked, "can I add an ensemble and more people and shit?" and Brown said, "sure!"  Why does he come off as arrogant? Well, he's just trying to make a living, and he's very pissed off. To a good degree, it's understandable.
Know someone with an invite available.
lol k  what should i do next
This proves nothing.
I think it was the youngsters.
You mean, do the *semantic* meanings of "perv" and "slut" mean the same thing.  This all varies from social group to social group. Slut is used commonly in reference to a woman's appearance that suggests hypersexuality, or her sexual habits. A pervert is a person, most commonly male who's appearance and/or behavior suggests that he is sexually deviant,  i.e. alternative lifestyle (homosexual, s&amp;m lifer, bisexual, just plain weird looking), habitual masturbator, rapist, necrophiliac, etc.   Yea, these two words are interchangeable in certain social circles. They are not interchangeable in all circles, for instance this one, but in a more conservative group they certainly could be. 
To escape underscores, prefix them with a backslash. Like so: \_ . The same thing is necessary for some other punctuation that's typically used for reddit markup.
...says the guy with the corporate user name.
&gt;He could be referencing the first one and saying something along the lines of 'because any system of mathematics is incapable of reaching all arithmetical truth therefore there must be something metaphysical to explain this.'  That's probably what he meant. [That doesn't mean he's right](http://www.nybooks.com/articles/archives/2004/jul/15/the-fabric-of-the-cosmos/), though:   &gt;Indeed, if the laws of physics are formulated in an axiomatic system S which includes the notions and axioms of arithmetic as well as physical notions such as time, space, mass, charge, velocity, etc., and if S is consistent, then there are propositions of higher arithmetic which are undecidable by S. But this tells us nothing about the specifically physical laws encapsulated in S, which could conceivably be complete as such. 
Alex Jones - the anti-science crusader is here to save us! Colloidal silver for all!
Why? Future grant proposals they sent would likely be denied out of spite or a misplaced belief that these scientists are idiots, even proposals for potentially groundbreaking research. All to save a little bit of money, when "we tried hard and couldn't find any males who'd never looked at porn" is a noteworthy result.
I'm an animation student at RIT... what the schools reputation in the professional world? Also any recommendations for grad school or getting a job?
I agree with what you said, but I would also like to add that the girl on the left got chubby out of nowhere.
[Thanks in advance!](http://www.minerwars.com/?aid=760) [http://www.minerwars.com/?aid=760](http://www.minerwars.com/?aid=760)
I made bottle bombs out of chemicals.  I blew one up at school.  1994.  No one gave a shit.
Custom Game: uncheck barbarians, custom continents ( 1 per team). get a religion fast.
[relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oSRMJO6yIkc)
Not zero, but a negligible amount.  And not nearly enough to make up for the fact that you'll be decreasing the amount of drinking that occurs, which is - by nearly every measure - a much more harmful activity.  But seriously, you speak like someone out of a "reefer madness" film.  You, quite obviously, have no experience with the drug, and, thus really have no idea what you're talking about...
Interesting.  I find gin-soaked olives to be the best part of a dirty martini.  To each their own :-)
I don't know if it's so much American as it is historical. The most powerful countries with the best military tech, be it horsemen, catapults, archers, or tanks are usually going to come out on top. Most of the greatest nations in history were born out of blood and war.
[If These Trees Could Talk](http://www.myspace.com/ifthesetreescouldtalk)   [Russian Circles](http://www.myspace.com/russiancircles)   [God is an Astronaut](http://www.myspace.com/godisanastronaut) Also, Pelican.  Sorry about the myspace links, but you can at least use them to check out a few songs and see if you dig, dig?   Happy travels.
It should be noted, for clarity, that the recommendation is to give a separate MMR and Varicella shot rather than four-factor MMR+V shot.  The shots are typically still given during the same visit.  To my (non-expert but hard-studying) knowledge there is only one four-factor formulation on the market: ProQuad by Merck.  Looks like it should get shelved.  From what I could find, the 1 in 1000 base rate is at or statistically near the background rate for febrile seizure events.
What I usually say is, "No thanks, I'm married." That's the gentle version.  The blunt version is offended that he thinks I'm the kind of woman that would cheat on my husband.  I don't know how normal women are, but I don't like to fuck around, and grow tired of men who think I'm trying to play hard to get.
Worcestershire sauce.  I always end up pronouncing it "Whar-shest-shire shause"
No problem. :)  Being unemployed sucks enough without having to add in boredom as well.
Kefka is amazing.  He's everything I would be if I chose to be a villain.
&gt; I'm just saying that showing a graph and going look, look, computers aren't getting faster is moronic.  At no point did I do anything remotely like that. If that's what you've been arguing against, I can see why you'd disagree.  &gt; Do you seriously think that there will be no increase in clock speeds in the same time span it took to go from MC68000 to Core i7?  There will probably be. However, I sincerely doubt it will be anywhere near as big as the one in the past.
"You dress really unique, and I wish I could have cool clothes like you." When people touch my hair, they say it's soft. Some old lady yesterday told me "How cute!" while waiting for my dad.  Compliments=better day for me. :D
I decided I wanted to be vegetarian when I was four. My parents went along with it and now very rarely eat meat.
Leave my pants out of this, sir!
I quit smoking 7 months ago, and I really want a cigarette. Any helpful tips?
Depending on where you are and how old you are, it might be relatively difficult to find a dealer that carries more than one strain. In high school, I can only think of a couple of dealers who had multiple strains, and many times it was just the illusion of choice (they were all equal and the same price). Also, theres many dealers out there who move bud so quickly with one strain that theres no reason to move up and buy another strain.   The main trick will be smoking with people, but its not only that. You should try to be smoking with new people as well. Friends tend to all go to the same dealers (in my experience). Thus, you need new friends with new dealers to really move up. 
A huge company overturns the life of a serviceman and his family for $500. I couldn't say What The Fuck enough...
To tell you the truth, I think it is more of an issue with the government rather than the operator as the truth is that we have a lack of infrastructure trams, trains, buses, stations etc to support our growing population.  Rather than spending billions on a shitty ticketing system that doesn't work, we would have been miles better off ordering new infrastructure in its place
Isn't it already in the making? :)
Shit. Any speculation on age requirements?
I used to wear colored contacts because I thought I was so defected. When I would take them out in college my dormmate would ask why. I td her and she told me I was crazy. 
I already was purchasing Old Spice for years because of their commercials, but it was because they weren't trying to sell product with sex.  That just feels like a cop-out, and makes me lose respect for the company.
pfff as u say so !
I didn't find the headline misleading at all... It would be crazy to think the EPA would refuse help because dutch could clean 99% of all oil and not 99.9985%, EPA would just let them clean the 99% then clean the last .9985%.  It's clear they're talking about efficiency in the title because that's the only way the EPA mandate would be even slightly sensible.
a friend has one, he likes it. i liked shooting it.
Do you use structured interviews? What questions do you ask, and how do you accurately compare candidate 1 to 2,3, etc?
Just hit on Jill, and don't let up.  If you do that, you will be my hero.  If I ever go on that show, I am gonna be like Tim Meadows, Ladies Man to her.
The baby not moving or kicking or doing anything usually gives it away. A lot of mothers usually say they experience a feeling of something just being wrong too, but that might be confirmation bias; the thing they fear the most coming true.
It will be interesting to see Landon play at man city that's for sure on right toure and silva down the center swp or who ever is on the other left   Idk but should be a good season for man city... Hopefully 
5 burgers in a day, week, month year?
http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=concern+troll
University of Florida.  That Masters degree is ridiculous.  This is like 12 years of school for you. Which are you at?
The Rolling Stones - Ruby Tuesday I can't help but get a lump in my throat while listening to it.
Zelda: Wind Waker, Team Fortress 2 and Dark Cloud 2 are my favorite games. People can take their "hardcore" gaming mentality and cram it up their overly-constricted asses.
It isn't the highest level competition, but the level of play is not bad.  It is basically like the best of the best U-21 squads + a few senior stars.  
I don't think any of that is actually in the platform, especially not the way you describe it.   Just think about the opposite of what you are saying.  The government approved monopolies, the full nationalization of all schools and learning institutions at all levels, and full faith and power instilled in bureaucrats to pragmatically take care of everything.  There needs to be balance in the debate, and mischaracterizing a platform you probably wouldn't give a chance anyway only discredits yourself.
agreed! stop turning me on with your tortoise talk ;)
Isn't OP's procedure similar to going to Start --&gt; Shutdown? What're the differences between a ctrl+alt+del shut down vs. a start -&gt; shutdown? Don't mean to drag on, I'm genuinely interested.
Its a rejection of god claims. (one definition anyway)
Ahhh finally get to play L4D, wanted that for aggges. Think Ill pick up Red Faction too :)
This guy is the son of one of the founders of Hamas.  Check out his story here.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mosab_Hassan_Yousef
Well then, don't try to do a Very Low Carb diet. Because you simply *can't* do it and still eat bread.
I agree completely, it's how I started. In Reddit servers, some of the players are stronger players and there is a normal respawn rate, which can get frustrating to new players that die fairly quickly. You can't really be held accountable for your playing because most of the time, you're not the only shitty player there.
Regardless of your definition. You just wrote " upon probable cause.... In other words People were secure, but not completely if there were probable cause. The power of the Government, with probable cause exceeds that right. Doesn't it? It was a right...but not an unrestricted one, it had limitations.
Almost at 8 inches long. 4 1/2 inches around.
*Throw in a can of food and baby can practically live on his own.*  Too funny.
Nevermind...the vote was a couple of hours ago.  The unemployed are screwed :(  EDIT: I was wrong.  Reid is caught up in negotiations with Brown and Co., so the vote will be probably be sometime tomorrow.  Get the word out!  EDIT: It's official now, 58-38.
I couldn't even finish reading that first paragraph.
othx 4chan
Nice! Bee shots are difficult, especially when you have an irrational fear of them.
The Paranormal Activity 2 trailer made it look promising.   I have serious reservations about the inclusion of the dog. It'll be awesome to see it react to 'the demon.' At the same time the chances of the dog surviving are so slim that it's upsetting.
NOOOO, My sister and I were looking forward to seeing this movie.  The animated series were pretty bad ass (this is coming from a college graduate)
I have a Pioneer receiver with two HDMI inputs and one output, however I'm pretty sure that they're just there for show.  Tried hooking up my pc and DVDR to the tv via the receiver.  It just won't work.  Checked the manual and it turns out that not all HDMI devices are supported.  Brilliant.
Nicotine...truly the hardest drug to quit.  I hope the treatment works.   
I think that's a bizarre benchmark. For example, I imagine a time in the future when technology has advanced enough to grow children in artificial wombs from conception.  I think when the fetus can feel pain, (which is fairly late as recently discovered) or has become self-aware (I can't imagine how we would figure that one out) would be a better guideline.
From my understanding, which may very well be wrong, power/toughness and the card color are the only thing classified as properties. So if a creature has "This creature's power/toughness are based on X" that would not be stripped. Although with sudden spoiling that wouldn't matter anyway, since it states it becomes a 0/2.  However I am a noob and have been wrong about these things before. Take this with a grain of salt.
["...wow"](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/_Ae0l5wTwb7s/Rnv1PZuUruI/AAAAAAAAAGI/y4jZWlQ86jA/s320/Mr%2BScorpion.bmp)
I have an answer for you, Mr Borez. And [here it is](http://www.amazon.com/Pipedreams-Beatin-Barack-Wind-Gift/dp/B002QKI1DK).  Order yours today!
Too bad it doesn't fetch good beer! Woooo! In all seriousness, that is pretty cool.
How does it feel to have wasted 4 years of your life?
But those TOP500 computers are massively parallel computers already, and they are utilizing them.
The thing is that when billions and billions of dollars go into something (like TV advertising) then even a 1% improvement in the effectiveness of the market is worth tens or hundreds of millions of dollars.   If I take this Old Spice commercial as an example; there are a couple of main factors in making this particular advert successful.   Number one is the flawless, brazen delivery of the clever lines by a *man's man* ( &amp; total stud TBH) who is talking to *our* women (sat beside us on the couch) and openly acknowleding to the men watching that yes, he's 100x more 'attractive' than most of us and yes, Old Spice only makes us smell like him but that that's a start. They get away with this by being *extremely* facetious with their choice of visuals and script.  The second quality is that because the adverts are visually clever and actually *not* CG they are worthy of social media attention as a sort of 'oh, that was clever' curiosity. The linked vid has 5k views right now, but the ad will probably top something in the order of 5 million online views on youtube in the next couple of weeks. We probably wouldn't be quite as frothy-mouthed if this was some kind of CGfest.  The fact that Old Spice was by now a quasi-retro or maybe slightly old fashioned (yet still insanely well known brand) really helps here.  What I'm trying to articulate is that if you reverse-engineer this ad and assess what they're trying to do with it we see that they're trying to create something that's virally marketable and aimed directly at young men and women who will dig this script, be in turns jealous of/attracted to this guy on screen and tacitly agree that it might sort of be a good idea to smell like that. These guys have been planning to break the product into a younger market and they've done exceptionally well.  Please excuse the scatty writing, it's 1am and I'm shattered :D
Fuck you. :'-(
Europeans teams never win world cups outside of Europe, I think this cup will just confirm it. Therefore Netherlands, Germany and Spain are out of my predictions.  Ghana? No, they just didn't show that much football.  From the South Americans we've seen how well they performed in the classification matches. Among them, Brazil performed better; it is my shot.
 * 01 Those who understand ternary  * 02 Those who don't understand ternary  * 03 Those who confuse ternary with binary  * 10 Those who confuse quadnary with ternary
Spammer cocksucker. Stop doing that.
Who's crying? I was calling you out for being a lying ignorant hypocrite. And you proved me right.
Some people died here in the states too.  I don't care too much about them.  I care even less for people who signed up for a deadly job.
"No, seriously guys, I can press a button and make the price of oil go up a bunch in a day."  "No way dude, no way."  "Fuck you!  Watch."  
&gt;Which part of the EIA report being a prediction based on current  trends do you not understand?  You cited it, not me. :)  &gt;Which part of wind being part of the total renewable solution do you not understand?  The only renewable that works at large scales is hydroelectric. It has been around forever and has reached critical mass in most places. Wind can help a bit (but not as much as nuclear), and the other renewables are marginal, as the EIA report *you cited* said.   The really funny (er, I mean sad) thing about your claims about renewables if you include hydroelectric, is that the share of renewables in the United States has decreased from about [31% of electricity in 1949 to 8% in 2009](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:USRenewableElectricity.jpg).  &gt;You really are amazingly ignorant for someone who pretends to be interested in this subject!  You are amazingly in denial for someone that cites reports that contradicts your own claims.  It appears that you are getting rather upset by someone actually reading your citations and pointing out what they say. Maybe you should actually read them next time. :)
Yeah, plus being fat and cheap makes the decision that much easier for me.
There really isn't any. There are no actual physical relics that indicate that Jesus of Nazareth ever lived. If anyone brings up the Shroud of Turn, Lance of Longinus, Shard of the True Cross, ect. I suggest you look them up first. None of these things have been proven to be authentic and some have been proven to be false. The best that you can find are writings outside of the bible that mention Jesus, however those that are early enough to show for a fact that Jesus was a real person are non existent, and those even old enough to indicate that it may be true are rare and far in between. The best there is to my knowledge is Testimonium Flavianum by Josephus, and this work is both heavily criticized and still too young to be considered solid evidence.
Only if it's done in a whiny manner. 
Oh Shi-
Could you give me the name &amp; publishing info of the book? Thanks! :) 
The choice is not simply between giving these people a forum where it's ok to spout racist shit or "pretending they don't exist".  No one has advocated that.
I'm sure they just need a hand, and then they'll be on their way.
It sounds like you chewed a bit differently, but it reminded me of one of my favorite scenes: [Alex](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=arijbOzqM-E#t=1m30s)
I have to apologize then. That pure rocky mountain spring water they use in their beer? Well, that water runs right through town, and it was a hot day, and I went swimming in the river and I may have peed a couple of times.
Blue Sheep Wall
Awesome! Please tell me you live some place that is not Texas... I gotta get out of here!
Forbidden.
How would you remove a desire for it? What crimes?  Alcohol related ones sure, but others?  This would only lead to an increase in others.  You you've not made much change and you've alienated people's rights. 
New blog post from Blumberg Advisory Group on customer service
holy moly that is a s***load of money for a pension
You should really read [why overpopulation is a myth](http://overpopulationisamyth.com/pop101/)
Ebert says, "The Last Airbender is an agonizing experience in every category I can think of and others still waiting to be invented." 
Someone explain to me what "male-looking genitalia" means in context of a pussy. Is it just an enlarged clitoris or something more?
It sounds like you play a lot of games and visit porn sites.
So that makes it OK for some asshole to come write all over it?  Maybe he had it painted white because *he wanted it to be painted white.*  You don't know what's best for other people and their property, especially not when it comes to scribbling some cliche on a wall.  Where do you live?  I want to come spraypaint your house exactly what **I** want it to look like.  After all, it's my decision what your house should look like, not yours.
Sorry 'bout that....but more importantly, thank god your WoW account isn't hacked.
Because you know, Guild Wars, that's the bigger MMO everyone is trying to catch up to their player base and size.
I have music off and quested while playing my own music, I'm a bad alpha tester, sorry :(
At the very least they'll probably try to get him to stop doing it in the future.
Chairman Meow
Order a virgin cuba libre.
Waiting and delivering are two very different jobs.  I'm not sure I would trust you on this one, you don't have to buy gas to serve your customers their food.  Not that this is an excuse for the guy to ask for more money.
I was looking for Javert.  He's not so much a villain as some one determined to do the right thing, as he believes it to be so.  He just doesn't know that he's missing information.  He's not a bad person at all - but he is the embodiment of the evil that the protagonists must avoid.  A good portion of the bad in this world is caused by people with good intentions, but I don't often see it portrayed in books or movies.  It's not as dramatic as a truly evil villain or an unfeeling criminal.  It says something that I retained this opinion of Javert when I really hate reading Hugo.  Seriously, how many chapters do you need to describe the damn cathedral, anyway?
The window at a LOST finale party: http://imgur.com/ADFH0.jpg
Oh, it shows results alright.  Empowerment of gangs?  Check.  Constitutional violations?  Check.  Street violence?  Check.  Moral panic?  Check.  Not like those silly space exploration endeavors that are only good for launching satellites and putting people on the moon.  
That actually carried over from my 3G as well. It also has "Butt" as my carrier name.
*33333337 -* *Just because you faggots bought a shitty little phone doesn't mean it's of "public concern." It means it's of "stupid faggot concern." And I believe you'll find there are no laws to protect stupid faggots' rights.*  What are you, 12? Nobody is going to take you seriously when you throw around words like "stupid faggot" like that.   You might as well just blow a vuvuzela into the comment box. 
THAT WAS THE JOKE
Innis &amp; Gunn is an extremely classy light ale that you can find in Tesco (but not Sainsburys anymore). Ruddles County is alright and easy to get hold of, I don't know if anywhere stocks Bath Ales but if they do they always go down well.  On the lager front Bath Ales also do a fantastic one (odd I know), I'm also currently partial to a Corona with a shot of lime juice, goes perfectly with the hot weather!  Personally I would go with the Innis &amp; Gunn as I love it, and I've had great success recommending it to other people, too (you're going to a party, I assume you're going to bring enough to share... right?)
no, 24. i'm 24 and do not need to enter my parents income
Ok, heres a classic one,  3 friends in Madrid, Spain, myself an argentinian, my best friend, a egyptian of palestinian decent, and his friend, an american guy from new mexico, at the time, im 18, my friend is 17 and his friend is 16, but we all look older, we go to see a movie on gran via, which is one of the main streets in madrid, and when we get out, some guy offers us discount cards for a stripclub, we pass, 3 days later it was the american guy´s last night in madrid, so we take him out to this 7 storie club called Kapital, usual douchbag hangout, but its a fucking 7 storie club, its worth a look if you´re ever in madrid, its 2 AM, were bored out of our minds and the egyptian guy mixed alcohol with meds, he wasnt supposed to go out, but since it was his friends last night, he did, so the american guy suddendly pulls out the strip club advert card, and we both go "shite...", so we find ourselfs at 2:30 am in a cab going to gran via to find the strip club, we find the guy who gave him the card and he drags us to the "strip club" which ends up being a bar with all the windows blacked out, filled with middle aged fat latino women, all of them looking at us as if we were the last chicken wing in the basket, se scrable out and as were clearing the place the same advert guy grabs us and says "you liked that place, you´re gonna love the next one", takes us to another bar with blacked out windows, this time buys us a round of beers so we stay a bit, but the bar is filled with even uglier women, so were sitting in the bar, hurdeled togather, getting hungry looks and we just look at each other and say "fuck free beer, we´re leaving", we finaly find a proper strip joint, get billed around 20 euros in the entrance by this guy who at first we mistook for a bum with the nastiest cigar ever, we walk in, and go order our drinks, we order them and are told to sit down, and some ladies come up to serve our drinks, the egyptian guy is just looking at the woman serving his drink, and dosnt notice her saying "say when" so he ends up with a full tube glass filled with vodka, and a tonic on the side, we start watching the show, and we get this weird vibe, and the girls kept coming and talking to us, utill we noticed, in spain, most strip joints double as brothels, so its 5am, the american guy has this russian redhead which we saw do such a wide spread eagle we could see her kidneys 10 minutes ago on stage on his lap, hes basicly saying to her "i swear, if i had the money, i would fuck you, but im broke", the egyptian guy was basicly saying "im going to hell for this" and i was just going "this is too weird for me"  TL;DR : 3 guys (2 of them underage) get dragged from brothel to brothel thinking they were strip joints, 
Omar.
Oh cool I didn't realize he lived so close to me, I need to go to his church one day.
That is stupid. So you are saying that based on what the reader feels is reasonable they can pick and chose any information they want.  That means there would be no right answer.  Which if fucking retarded.  You need to come back into reality where the question defines the answer.  It tells you what to consider.
The Feds should have led her on with false information and took advantage of her. 
I've seen other tries, but they were immediately swarmed by other *dickheads*.  So he was just kinda lucky to pick a wannabe I guess.
Your post reminds me: the red sauce at some Del Tacos has beef in it. I found this out in a most unpleasant way.
No, they won't! 
It's not my deficiency buddy, there's been plenty of well respected people who openly say that threading is in fact hard, it's not some well kept secret. This is a generally accepted fact, and believe you me, many people smarter than either of us openly say it's a problem.   The fact that you are arguing the opposite says volumes.
The problem is if we all try to work in the same place as we live we get overcrowded urban areas. Only answer to that is suburbia, which only works because we get cheap oil. Cant take oil out of the equation, then the whole system breaks down
I don't know the specific weeds, maybe clover etc., but our yard is almost always green, even when our neighbours' lawns get parched and yellowed in August because it's just hardy and resilient weeds.
Hillabee is right. Bees really like white clover (Trifolium repens; aka dutch clover). Honeybees cannot gather the nectar from the red clover however bumble bees can.   Some other advantages of having a clover lawn: http://hubpages.com/hub/Clover-Lawns   You might want to build a solitary bee house: http://www.foxleas.com/bee_house.htm  Plant flowers in big patches to make it worthwhile for bees to go there.  Here is a list of plants and their blooming season: http://www.associatedcontent.com/article/1970598/how_to_design_and_plant_a_bee_garden_pg3.html?cat=32   Here is another article on gardening for bees:   * http://gardening.about.com/od/attractingwildlife/a/Bee_Plants.htm   * http://gardening.about.com/od/attractingwildlife/a/Bee_Plants_2.htm
different side of highway 6. i'm near jersey village
I hope you were able to find help. If not, here is a posthumous upvote. 
Because it brings attention to them, if everything stayed within the scene they would have a lot less raids, cops etc to deal with.
I'd hit that shit like a sledgehammer to the foot
Get a better job, and don't expect the customer to subsidize your shitty working conditions. 
I rolled up about $200 in old quarters because the local bank said they didn't have a counter :/ Anyway, there's something very nice about wrapping them up and putting them in the bottom of a now-surprisingly-heavy shoebox.
This was accidentally posted to the wrong subreddit, right?
Just a question here.  Who else thinks that in certain scenarios *(maybe this one?)* that phonetically typing out how an Asian person speaks English isn't as racist as one would immediately think?   Half way through reading that *I* thought so, I then started getting into it and picturing Miyamoto actually saying that in that manner.
I don't know why Arsenal is still counted as a 'bandwagon' team (after not having won anything since half the team was in diapers). It looks like Manchester City FC has usurped this role and stands alone with Manchester United, Chelsea and Liverpool.  Arsenal fans today are fans of one-touch football and smart money-management.
&gt;  Makes a nice night light. A $450 night light.    ... enjoy your 0.015 seconds of fame.
**nobody fuckin cares anymore dude. Futurama is back**
They can't hear you here.
Can he also bring real beer?
It's June right now, so probably raining like a motherfucker. 
You actually made it past the first line? Good for you. Was there anything interesting?
I'll tell you what, I'd go nuts if I was stuck bring limited to 20kph in order to hit all the lights in the "green wave".
Yeah, green for green, square deal!  I've been thinking of an image with green leaves, green dollar signs, and a legend like "PLEASE TAX US". 
Go on...
No
What was your friends crime?
pc east-coast
VLC cannot play this file. Already tried.
Harder better faster stronger!
Not exactly. You fight mutants and travel in time, it's pretty cool actually.
I have a big problem with TV watching for kids. It's not so much the programming as the advertising.  Of course, most popular kids shows are really just ads trying to sell the merchandise associated with the show. How many kids out there have Dora backpacks or Spongebob lunch boxes?  I just have serious concerns regarding the commercialization and capitalization of our kids. I don't like the brain-washing associated with TV today.
Do ThroneIt instead of dotapub. It's easier to coordinate joining games imo because it is semi-private (the games don't show up on the games feed).
Blackstar is getting good at it....
My girlfriend has this odd tendency to stop in the middle of a conversation and smell my right shoulder (which is at her face height). It's so ridiculously cute. She says that she loves how I smell, and that normally I smell like soda, and my sweat smells like vinegar. And she smells amazing, by the way. A sweet, flowery smell that's kind of earthy. Every so often I will get a whif of something that smells like her when she's not there and I stop to think of her.
Yes it is.
Yes, but I change their names. There are several variations of "bitch" and "asshole" in my phone.
I think the original poster just hates ducks...
